On one hand, republicans are supposed to be for a smaller government..  so reducing the size of the DEA aligns with their ideals.  On the other hand, sweet sweet money.
#you can't break everything you worked for.... 
Hello.  Please resubmit with either "LPT" or "LPT Request" in your title so the moderators can see and review your post.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/LifeProTips) if you have any questions or concerns.*
**Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky** [artist pic](https://lastfm-img2.akamaized.net/i/u/252/6cbf47386fef23b2a72dc03980237f2e.png) &gt; Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky (Russian: Пётр Ильич Чайковский)(7th May 1840-6th November 1893; Old Style 25th April 1840–25th October 1893) was a Russian composer. He wrote some of the world's most popular concert and theatrical music in the current classical repertoire, including the ballets Swan Lake and The Nutcracker, the 1812 Overture, his First Piano Concerto, several symphonies, and the opera Eugene Onegin. His names are also transliterated Piotr, Petr, or Peter Ilitsch, Ilich, Il'ich or Illyich; and Tschaikowski, Tschaikowsky, Chajkovskij and Chaikovsky (and other versions; Russian transliteration varies between languages).  &gt; Tchaikovsky was born in Kamsko-Votkinsk, Russia, to a mining engineer and the second of his three wives, a Russian woman of French ancestry. Musically precocious, he began piano lessons at the age of five. He obtained an excellent general education at the School of Jurisprudence and was a civil servant before entering the St Petersburg Conservatory from 1862 (the year of its foundation) to 1865. In 1866, he was appointed professor of theory and harmony at the Moscow Conservatory, established that year. He held the post until approximately 1878.  &gt; From 1878, Tchaikovsky focused primarily on composition. Tchaikovsky toured the United States in 1891 conducting performances of his works. In 1893, Tchaikovsky was awarded an honorary Doctor of Music degree from Cambridge University.   &gt; Tchaikovsky died nine days after the premiere of the Sixth Symphony, the "Pathétique". Most of his biographers have considered his death to have been caused by cholera, most probably contracted through drinking contaminated water several days earlier. In recent decades, however, various theories have been advanced by some sources that his death was a suicide. However, these theories have not yet been substantiated with proof. Read more on Last.fm.   [last.fm](https://www.last.fm/music/Pyotr+Ilyich+Tchaikovsky): 901,327 listeners, 12,156,588 plays tags: *Classical, romantic, russian, composers, instrumental* ^^Please ^^downvote ^^if ^^incorrect!  ^^Self-deletes ^^if ^^score ^^is ^^0.
Idk if u posted right as I fixed but I fixed it after the other user pointed out :( i accidentally typed the wrong name in lol
It's made by BigAnt.   Cool. 
Problem with that statistic is that it's for a single year only. 
It's a sure relief. I like this sub.
https://scontent-sea1-1.xx.fbcdn.net/v/t1.0-9/15232106_10154008741927014_761265722088994801_n.jpg?oh=145e4ffa9a2421e623e4f19b285dbf8c&amp;oe=58C43DC3
Yes that is correct. It doesn't make what I said untrue.  I was just commenting that the typical nativity story everyone thinks is in the bible is quite different. For example the Wise men did not meet Jesus right when he was born in that manger.
thissss video issss pretty ssssweet. itssss pretty good mang. nazisssss are dope. ok i'll sssstop
We used to get some of our lab glassware modified at our university.   Not sure if they still have that dept for it as we've changed our glassware needs and no longer need the modifications done.  Might still exist and have a resource or two available for you to inquire about.   Will check some of our people to see if they remember the fellows name that did it.
True, but it'd be cool to have a whole bunch of positions and jobs in the government sector of this sub. If we get a president again, it could be his/her responsibility  EDIT: To expand, I think having a lot of different positions in the "government" would be a cool way to make people feel more involved in this sub. We can museum curators, movie night people, law enforcement, etc. Then maybe it would spiral out into an economy as we realize we need to "pay" these people with internet points. We could make a bot that pays people or something and...idk. This probably isn't the original vision of this sub, but I think it'd be cool to set up a system like that
A subscription to Prime unlimited listening I love it!
Copy and paste the Encrypted message into a decryption generator. One of them will work                     :)
Well when you watch anime that is catered to a dominant male demographic then of course they will be shows that sexualize women. Some people may not want to admit it, but sex does infact sell. It's not just anime in general that sexualize women, but basically all forms of media do it to some degree. Once again, sex sales. I don't think any medium is trying to show women that, "this is the ideal women and you should act like this." They are simply creating women that people like to find in their fantasies. Likewise, women arn't the only ones who get sexualized. You will find shows that also sexualize men, especially the ones that are catered to a female demographic.
I drop the Gg Ez nearly every time because it triggers babies into making threads like this one.  Edit: the downvotes, just like your in-game tears, give me strength.
Maybe I'm being dense but the wording has confused me a bit here.   &gt; Takes your "pro looking" level from 0-100 real quick  What is pro looking and why do I want it to look "pro"? 
Mine got banned for bustabit too:/
maybe if zombies actually did decent damage on their own.  Poison really just isn't that great in minion builds, at best you are probably going to come out with the same damage for higher investment.
You run out of fuel too quickly. Keep training.
West Virginia, Louisiana, and Alabama all have more Democrats regestierd. 
So, what place should I farm?
End of the month, you need to be at least rank 20 to qualify and then the rewards don't improve until 15
My plan is to keep delivering services that can be offered remotely - whatever they are.  Ageism matters less when you're never (or seldom) seen.  The more you know about technology in general, the easier it is to offer consulting services in that field, apart from development.
  First of all i want to congratulate you for recognizing your egocentric flaws, most people wont even admit to their own mistakes they like to blame people, just to avoid opportunities to be proven right to learn and change.  I have a hard time connecting with average people, people don't seem awake, they seem to be asleep and content.  My family either laughs at me, call me crazy, or try their best to change to subject when given these ideas. This has made me distant from them, im 21 and i live alone now, and i love it. 
What do you mean when you said "got with" her? You get with someone, which to me means you fooled around some and then gave her your number, which to me means you're going to follow things up.  Then the next she hears form you is you pissed off about facebook at her.  That's a dick move. Who gets pissed about facebook anyways?  That alone would be dickish.  But then to do it to some girl that you expressed interest in and clearly is expressing her interest in you.  
Is your matchup gonna be closer in assists or 3's?
Yep. This is me.  At some point I decided to own the weird and accept it.  I enjoy weird people more than "normal" people, find them easier to relate to even if our weirdnesses are different.  Every now and then I'll land in a toxic environment where people demean me for being weird, or point it out in an alienating way, but as I get older that happens less and less.
&gt; not a gary le shitter   okay
Finally, a shitpost I can get behind!
[Another](http://i.imgur.com/h60je2D.jpg)
There's something like this that happens in the 3 Stigmata of Palmer Eldritch. But it's drug induced. 
&gt; Ps. I'm very flattered to be in the same company with Froggie and other pros :P  lol np although I sense sarcasm.  Then again, you're on the top of the level rankings and is on the top 10 on the elo rankings. I had to add you :P  Plus I was just thinking off of random names that's commonly used such as you, Lundmar, jbs__. Froggy was added in because idk why.
Ah, its no problem. I'm ready now if you are.
I like the look of this, but I had a question. My experience with clear acrylic like this in the past is that it _always_ breaks on me, even if I'm careful with it. To the extent that when I see it I just automatically flash to all the shattered/cracked acrylic I've owned.   Could you speak to what you feel the durability of this is?
It's not really a *direct* copy, though. I rather like their interpretation of it, but I don't consider them to be the same painting. This one has the artist's own flair to it.  While they should have probably cited the original artist if they wanted to do their own version of it and got inspiration from it, I still think it's a really nice painting.
Just got home from class, but ordering the snap circuits tonight! Will update with tracking #.
I don't know what I expected...but that wasn't it.
duckduckgo
"inhumano" ...   es muy complicado poner una postura ahi tomando encuenta que el objetivo es matar al animal, si el animal pudiera opinar probablemente lo que quisiera es no estar muerto ....  ademas hay que tomar en cuenta la eficiencia y costos  , mientras existen formas para matar un animal sin que este sienta dolor toman mas tiempo , incrementan el costo o atrasan procesos,  (un claro ejemplo son las maquina degolladoras de pollos y reses)  nuevamente si quisieran ver condiciones crueles e "inhumanas" basta con ir  a un pueblito o incluso aqui en mi ciudad matamos cerdos con palos y agua hirviendo y eso no nos hace malos (campeche estado mas seguro del pais ) :v  por cierto los tacos estan muy ricos ... espero para el  otro milenio puedan sintetizar carne por que por mientras nada va evitarme atascarme unos 
Is that everything that makes you human, being alive? Then what separates humans from other animals?  For me it's probably our shared values and the way we can project ourselves into almost anything, and have a very unique ability with sympathy and empathy.
Because your kiss (your kiss) is on my list...
Not really. I am helping someone with minigames for a FNAF fangame though. Nothing Undertale-related, currently.
Dude.. How can you not even see **the first fucking rule of this sub**?
Waywatchers have fire while moving, 360 arcs and armor piercing damage.  That's also a huge deal.
From the buildings, that can only be Brooklyn.
Genau! Kein einziger Mensch in Deutschland denkt, dass Vergewaltigung manchmal okay ist! Aber gleichzeitig denken 27%, dass andere so denken! Das gibt Sinn und Überraschung, die Deutschen sind mal wieder die Geilsten und unfehlbar! Realität kann so einfach sein!
In all honesty, Valve probably already has an automated system that sweeps for cheat sites, buys a membership, downloads all the cheats, and then adds them to their naughty list. Trawling the web for this and dropping $15 on each site is nothing to them. 
Rinza is made for that purpose, but yeah, cafiza rocks as an all-around oil and protein remover.
&gt;Hur hur the dems were party of slavery 150 years ago so therefore they are racist now hur hur.  Really pathetic that you seem hellbent on throwing this around like it means something, ignoring conveniently the fact that the KKK *literally ~~held~~ will hold parades* to celebrate Trump's victory. Even more pathetic that you use phrases like "fact check" in an attempt to belittle those who point out how ridiculous you sound without any hint of irony.  You're embarrassing yourself.
What if I have a locking nut but can sort of feel the strings being pulled through? Just didn't tighten the locks enough?
In all fairness, some of these are just bad writing rather than bad acting.
&gt; Trump seems pretty Pro censorship  Examples?  EDIT:  Schmidt &amp; Co. showed up quick for this one,  votes gave it away.
I am the notarious. You got no proper id, sorry. come back in a thousand years, thank you for doing business here! 
das koo
They changed their website from www.primussucks.com to www.primusville.com like 10 years ago.
Thanks we try!
The Russian figure is for the year 2013. You'll be happy to know ~~(no you won't)~~ that the 2016 figure (January to October) is 14.7.
&gt; Except 99% of reddit doesn't bitch about the remainder being an echo chamber  Then what was your above post about, if not bitching about the fact that r/The_Donald is a 'safe space'?  EDIT: Someone who uses 'fascist' unironically, without actually knowing what fascism is. Rocket scientist, as I said
Doesn't look like anything to me
Sounds intriguing. 
There was no civil war. Look, if you're just going to make shit up so you can pretend to have a point, I think I'll just disable inbox replies so I don't even have to think about reading them.
I love Bob and don't particularly care for Bianca
You don't go to prison for kicking a dude in the dick.
You do not need to change your code if you change the driver. Use Chrome or IE, Firefox never worked right for me. 
Link wasn't working for me... http://www.espn.com/blog/mlb/rumors/post/_/id/31421/mlb-rumor-central-andrew-mccutchen-trade-looking-increasingly-likely
1 c3 for scorer sombrero?
Until I got laid off last month, I worked at a field tiling plant. If you don't know what that is, it's plastic piping that you put in crop fields to drain excess water. I certainly recognize the benefit, but there was always some unease. I can say with some pride that our plant was 'green' and frequently used recycled material.  I would sometimes imagine the plant in a post-apocalypse scenario (the work wasn't particularly rigorous, so I had plenty of time to day dream). Then I'd remember that all that plastic, not just in our stock yard but in the fields, wouldn't disappear without us. Even if humans disappeared (or regressed to a pre-industrial state), our legacy would carry on with these things that simply do not decompose. The only thing that eased my concern was the idea that maybe someday a microbe would evolve to be able to decompose the shit, but I don't know nearly enough about microbiology to know if that's even remotely possible.
In addition to u/athien's comment below, the list of actively filtered subs is displayed in the sidebar.
Is the friend of a friend milling the receivers himself from 80% lowers or does he just have a couple of dozen squirreled away?  If he's milling them himself, stay away.
Actually the first time I've saw this on here, still don't understand it though
Very much appreciated.   When this system first dropped, my brain was shifted to neutral as far as where to begin. I did not want to jump right in and regret the decisions I make.   Through some thought and this sub's swift response, I now have enough information to create a pretty clear path to follow with my units that I have dupes of. This is some fine work we've all done in just under 2 days. 
Well /u/PUTTY1 edited that there "was no point" which is more or less neutral answer to which of us is missing the point.  Don't know why I'm wasting on this but let me give it one last college effort- he's satirically mocking my post, by giving a theory that's defining characteristic is its absurdity(an *MiB movie* tie in?) and asking if I'd take a bet on that, IE, taking a bet on something that's obviously not going happen. I get that he was making fun of my post, the thing is I also think my post is stupid, if I saw it, I would say "yea no shit" and move on. But I made it because I know there are lots of people on here who aren't aware of how completely ludicrous the Logan=MiB theory is. Which is why I responded "haha yea that's my point, here's a similar absurd example(a terminator movie tie in) that I thought of before I even saw your post."
I was going to say the second exact thing, just got them a few weeks ago. I still lose my mind. 
lolwut
What do you have against likeable blonde girls? 😆
Oh yes, they're the kind of neckbeards who think feminism is the reason they can't get laid. Gotta love it when neckbeards congregate to discuss how to defeat the evils of feminism.
Lightning is vaporware.
Infiltrator irelia way to low. I hate order of the lotus, this just makes me mad that there are no really high quality irelia skins. 
/u/jkess04, your submission was removed for violating the following rules:  * Rule IV - Title violates title guidelines.  Your title must not ask for votes. You can read the full information about our title guidelines at /r/pics/w/titles  For information regarding this and similar issues please see the [rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/pics/about/rules/) and [title guidelines](/r/pics/w/titles). If you have any questions, please feel free to [message the moderators.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/pics&amp;subject=Question regarding the removal of this submission by /u/jkess04&amp;message=I have a question regarding the removal of this [submission.](https://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/5fshrm/upvote_this_post/?context=10000\))
[Wasn't he in the Twilight series?](http://1.bp.blogspot.com/-L5uD6TAi23s/TiRuv_enUCI/AAAAAAAABn0/E4MRaRNokIs/s1600/magnus%2Bcarlsen_taylor%2Blautner.jpg)
Teco club here too.
map link?
*names the Christian prophet and a biblical name  *doesnt mention anyone called 'God'  *neglects to mention 'Muhammad' being one of the most popular names in the world   Yeah it's easy to imagine 
Cannabis is one of the "recipes" shown in their list.
It's not a phone.
It can take awhile for them to get along,  it took a few months for mine to get used to each other. You could also watch some "my cat from hell"  as some episodes deal with that issue,  if you think it's particularly bad.
2c3 for photons
Think for yourself, girl. Who cares what this sub's hivemind has to say 
Thats cool man. I remember you got that old keg. Did you ever get to compete?
Now r/all/rising is just r/the_schulz. That's a very good thing.
244
I doubt it, it's not even the first list he's gotten over. 
Uncle Vlad attracts all the Ladies!  No. 39
For me, I love the way the bright but not garish colors work together, and it's usually a nice flowing minimalist design. But I get that everyone has their own preferences.
FYI - you're under no obligation to return the extras :) per the [FTC](https://www.consumer.ftc.gov/articles/0181-unordered-merchandise). 
Yeah he really revitalized the construction industry when he got the major industrial centers bombed flat.  I can hear /r/badhistory fucking spinning right now
俺もエメラルドグリーン系のドレスで着飾ってたよ
The idea of a list of enemies doesn't exactly trace itself back solely to the Big Bang Theory. Its use in American popular culture is probably due to Nixon's reportedly having one, but even then having and putting people on said list has been played for laughs for years.
Too young for license  Has "facial hair and shit"
*He shrugs.*  "Some parents are just like that."
Didn't post about Kinoshita and his new role because of..well... spoilers.  Also didn't write about Narita, so why the salt? :)
Sweet setup. What do you use the midi fighter for? Got one myself and was testing out scene switching, but had problems to find a decent programm that translates midi inputs to keystrokes on a single machine. 
You're good fam
The weather interaction makes no sense, unless it was something like Nature's Gift that played a weather, but that should have dropped it to 1, then buffed to 7 (2 special cards played)
So just making sure, Lemire is currently writing thanos, old man Logan, moon knight, descender and doing art for AD?  Am I missing anything?
Just not part way through the recording.
That's exactly what I thought! They look like greenies treats. 
Super minecraft kid is kinda cringey if you ask me, but yeah.. only one person.
I'd probably have an easier time swinging summers over here than getting over there.
still don't see you
Do you know where the Brotherhood are located after Search and Destroy on the island, I can't seem to find them.
Earth 2 and unmasked Batman? 
Ok. I'm at plaza, just send when you are ready.
This reminds me too much of my parents Jesus
777
Well what if you're someone like me who doesn't have Dark Seastar? And true... What if you had a full team of L/D Vics and Mihos? That would be interesting.
Productive thread. We need more of these wasted moments for idiots offering nothing. /notbtw
It's okay, the alligators had the amoebas 
I think it's a lack of self-awareness in general. 
You just have to avoid capture then; there's not really any way to counter Iron Grip, since that perk is in itself a counter to sabotage teams.  It would be better focus perks that lend toward evasiveness and stealth.
attendance resets each month, nothing you can do about it unfortunately.
Scorer parallax will probably be worth 15 give or take, in my opinion.
I was going to say - I've got some bad news pal...  The other member of the logjam is Parra, which I'll give you credit for trying to forget him
It's good to be the king.
Got the middle one, thanks!
Ya I don't get it either, they should just have it saying Maintenance and not tease us like this. That way when the game is actually playable we'd know. Iz Tragic
Fun, sexy, and I love it! Sexy tits as always 😜
I think you are right about it being bugged.
I will always love pope popeye
Are they allies? Are they allies as a consequence of the power of the US military? Disregarding Russia and China, many regional powers are allies because of their benefit of being friends with the only superpower on the planet. If the US stops being the sole power, well their focus shifts elsewhere.
They're no longer a thing. There are dedicated Pokémon that you unlock and use for the same purpose that you can just call to assist you.
Why? The shield is a bubble of energy, the same as the squad shields. I can't think of a material that would prevent a melee attack and still be mobile like the bubble is.
She nods, smiling from ear to ear. "Really? Can I go inside the cockpit?!" 
Sounds good! If you don't already have one, you'll probably also need [something](https://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B004UNG6FG/) to open the Lexmark up with to transfer the innards.
It's a balancing act, but I like not a dime going to companies in the form of subsidy or encouragement only to see them profit gouge on those investments. Likewise to lobby and manipulate the government regulations set up to provide for the safety of the population to control supply and meaninglessly vary patent design to continue extorting from yesterday's idea.  But you are right in that I have an axe to grind. My son contracted lyme disease and it was a painful and terrible process. Imagine my delight with the system then that there is a vaccine for lyme, which ceased production in the 90s because it was not profitable enough.  Now, being a reasonable capitalist, you're going to think some variety of "so sorry for your luck, maybe if he had a more fashionable illness the market could cater to his needs" and I'd understand, because fuck the market, the government has every need to be in an industry where profitability skews business decisions to the detriment of the whole.   In short, government should be in the business of vaccines, not companies who, on the verge of curing any ailments, realize they are wasting research dollars when they could be pursuing something valuable instead.
When I first meditated while lying down, I experienced the feeling of levitating where I was, it was totally cool until I tried to move and then the feeling of gravity hit me like a ton of bricks.   I think the hardest part is making sure you don't fall asleep. As for the mind wandering, I tend to notice a lot of people may see that as a bad thing but if anything, those mind wandering moments tend to symbolically tell you what you are thinking of (so, they shouldn't be ignored but rather focused on) which is a form zazen meditation. 
Just making sure you weren't the guy who sent me a ton of nasty shit a few weeks ago. I got the "Thanks for making Xbox Live a better place etc etc" message today, so I felt kinda guilty.
That is correct, Very limited it what it does / allows you to change, if you want options any other free a/v will do that.
CHUPA! A camisa da CBF deve estar mofando uma hora dessas! Eu já sabia!
You're fucking lovely. 
It read like a conversation with the janitors at my office. I understand what's happening, I think, but it's taking me a couple tries to fully grasp it
It's not the total power that's the issue it's the delivery rate.   I suspect the wattage you're looking at is for a 8 hours in full sun.  A man portable solar panel is going to be able to charge a cell phone. ....maybe
No :/ this is my first wireless trade in SuMo. I assume festival plaza, yeah?
The last track definitely ends abruptly. Just feels like there should be more. 
Ha! I love it.
Im pretty tall and generally intimidating. I can pleasantly greet someone and they kind of shrink away without any hostility from myself. Blessing/Curse. 
Question about Food Buffs.  I noticed the buffs for food items (crafted and purchased) have a level listed next to them. What does this mean? It seems to be between level 1 and 20. Is it just the strength of the buff? Or does it have something to do with cooking skill? Like, if Iggys cooking level is 3, and you make something with a level 1 HP boost and level 5 attack boost, will you not get the attack boost? I haven't seen this mentioned anywhere but maybe someone knows? 
When was anyone ever arrested for burning a rainbow flag?
Right at the end of his 8 year term... 
What about it? Two pieces of bread with a bunch of other stuff in the middle with intent to close on all sides, thus it's a sandwich. A long sandwich.
Running the factory at the North Pole.
Thank you. Sadly it wasn't regenerator but a shiny is a shiny. 
I used to work with a guy who played santa at Myers (I think). Our work would let him take unpaid leave for the four weeks he worked, so he could still have his four weeks paid leave at other times during the year.  I remember the boss saying it worked well when it came to staffing hours, because there's about eight weeks a year of quiet period where the bloke really wasn't needed anyway.
Thanks for the singing tips! I think most of those can be cleared up by having the lyrics more solidified, because most of them in the recording were improvised. I might be recording a new version this weekend if I have time 
Lien ? 
I don't want to suck my own dick...  I know, fuck me right?
It even matches the case I have on order! 
24/M/Straight  I haven't gotten any matches in the past month or so. Just wondering what I can do to improve that.  http://m.imgur.com/a/gqxhA
I suggest compromise.  I'm a non-religious person who LOVES Christmas. I love Christmas because, for me, it is a celebration of life, goodness, magic, nostalgia, and tradition.  I completely understand that not everyone feels this way and since living with my partner (and my ex partner before this one), my holidays have been a very careful compromise between indulging in my Christmas mania and respecting the boundaries of the people around me. But it *is* a compromise. Even though my partner finds Christmas unnecessary, overindulgent, and vaguely stressful, he was more than happy for me to decorate the living room to my heart's content, and does not groan when I play Christmas songs or movies.  In exchange, I keep Christmas media to a minimum, and always check in with him to see if he's getting overwhelmed.  I completely understand that you have very limited interest in Christmas. But many people see it as a representation of love, goodness, generosity and inclusion, and they interpret a rejection of Christmas as a rejection of all those wonderful qualities. So you might have your best success in finding a happy medium.  You don't have to go to every single Christmas event you're invited to. But to reject every single on would be interpreted as rudeness, regardless of how reasonable your reasons are. So try to go to at least *one* event with every social group you're apart of. Go to at least one work Christmas drinks. Partake in at least one Christmas tradition with your friends. Show that whilst you might not care about Christmas, you care enough about *them* to play ball.  You shouldn't feel obliged to buy an ugly sweater if you don't want to, or to decorate your home, but if you have lots of people coming over to your house often, it might be worth it just to throw an extra few candles about, or to put up some fairy lights. A tiny bit of festivity is a small price to pay to escape the endless questions of, "But WHYYYYYY do you hate Christmas?"  But if people ask why you don't have a Christmas tree, or why you aren't having a traditional Christmas dinner, just say, "I'm Jewish, we don't celebrate Christmas." Maybe make up a white lie and talk about traditions (whether you practice them or not) that your family partake in towards the end of the year. But the fact that you're Jewish *should* be enough for most people.   Also make up a white lie about what you're doing on Christmas Day. Tell them you're visiting family or something, or that you have your own sacred holiday observance. Because if you tell people you're alone, people *will* insist that you join them for their Christmas, and will not want to hear, "Oh, I honestly don't mind being alone watching TV."   So yeah. If your community really is as Christmas-obsessed as you say, it might be worth partaking in at least *some* of the secular traditions just to keep the peace.
&gt; 1.) Avoid PHP  I would disagree. One nice thing about PHP is that a there's a big community.  As long as people (1) police PR's (like they should) and (2) use an existing framework, you will be fine.  You can easily get away with hacky implementations in java, .net, and nodejs.  Heck, I'd start to argue that javascript is getting to the same place (in regards to reputation) as PHP, but that's _reaaaaly_ off topic.
you should message them, because hardly anyone use gamepad so it is possible that they remove it. 
That's an interesting thought. I'm kinda debating whether or not Yhwach really was actually scared of Ichigo's true Bankai. He described it as "fearsome" but I often consider that he only broke it just to send Ichigo into much deeper despair. To not have even a slight bit of hope in his own powers was what Yhwach wanted to see.  I'd like to believe that it was indeed because Yhwach feared the Bankai, because goodness gracious that would be hella powerful. But I also consider the possibility that Yhwach was merely giving Ichigo a patronizing compliment for what he had achieved, after breaking it to break Ichigo.
This is unbelievable.  Hitler did some good things for Germany as well.  And Castro didn't really do great things, Russian subsidies did.
There is a [discussion on Hacker News](http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=13072956), but feel free to comment here as well.
"Hey Tom." He grins at him, gesturing to a seat.
I was just in Gatlinburg in September thats sad stuff
No, a few homes are being proposed to be built on private land.  The owners of that land are asking to be allowed to build these homes without having a frontage road, as is usually required.  Please, do not post clickbait titles here and do not use all caps while doing so.
Nice LHT :)
Too early. 
IGN: Kazy   Deposited: Wingull, Lv. 6, Male, Quick Ball   Thanks in advance!
Cool :D
I honestly don't see billy Hamilton as a huge upgrade over Ben revere. Why give something up for something we already have 
Life based Evasion maybe hybrid Evasion/armor Avatar of fire flicker strike full fire conversion Raider. full conversion from added fire dmg, chernoborg's pillar, Weapon/Shield ,auras herald of ash, blasphemy-warlord's mark.  I plan on using the new necklace for AoF and then respeccing out of the actual node.  https://www.pathofexile.com/passive-skill-tree/AAAABAIBAABeAO4DdQUtCC4JMw2NEvEUdRUgFm8XJhhWGY4abButHNwdFCPTI_Ykqij6KjgqTSzpNZI26Ty-PeI-zz8nQYdDMUjuSQ9KfUrITP9NRk2STipRTFT-WHdaGluvXwRfcF-wYuxodGuQbqpyw3Ttd9d4rnqEeu99W311gseDbYTvh3aNfY8aj2CRK5S4m42btZ2uo4qnCKsLrEevjbGztfK3PriTvebBgsMzwzrKSswG0TbTftct2GDYvdjV2mLawd0N4izjauOf6-7tg-969qP5Y_no-tL-Cv66  not certain on what weapon type to use :/
30y here and the SP was outstanding.
How am I downplaying Murray at all?
We've had this card back in the collection tab for  6+ months. Pretty sure it wasn't like this.
its going to be hard to find a zwave switch that works without a neutral. I think GE/Jasco used to make one but not sure if they do anymore. You may want to think about using a smart bulb or using a microswitch installed behind the fixture.
Two things.  First, at SRs where people do teamfights (Plat and up), the ability to engage or disengage on your terms and not the enemy's is massive, often decisive.  Second, speed ups your effective HP a lot more than un-amped healing and often more than amped heals.  Strafing while speed-boosted makes you a lot harder to hit, so potentially fatal damage simply doesn't register.  Similarly, you can entirely avoid ults by speeding out of LOS/AOE.
Minor illusion is great, so much you can do with it.  Friends is pretty good, but limited to people you know you'll never see again, or people already in your control who can't harm you.  Mage hand is also a decent option, especially if you take on the role of party rogue.  Always safer to open a door or chest from 30 ft away.
You're proving that it's a choice by stating that you could choose to not pay your taxes but face jail time. You have the choice of not doing so but you will face a negative consequence - that implies choice. It may not consist of the options you want and the only alternative could end up being negative but it's still a choice nonetheless. 
Yep. Newly subscribed and joining in on the effort to MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN!
das ist echt das beste von allen :D
To go even further on this; it is a great lesson to be learned in life in general. 
Well they could just be Canadian 
cheapest with the features you need. 
[Source](http://www.pixiv.net/member_illust.php?mode=medium&amp;illust_id=38770998) The title actually translates as "Chen is an expression of Yakumo's formula!", according to Google. I embellished it needlessly. Be thankful I'm not a professional translator and localiser.
This post was removed because it was missing the required **[Safari Unknown]** tag for unknown safari threads. If you are a new user and don't know which pokemon you have, please insert **[Safari Unknown]** in the title of your post and try again. If you know what your safari pokemon are, please [add them to your flair](http://friendsafaribot.tumblr.com/) and try again.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/friendsafari) if you have any questions or concerns.*
So more than likely your co-worker's computer either 8s not getting the gpo applied correctly or they talked to IT and got special permission and the gpo applied to their computer modified.  At my work place we have a few computers that gpos do not work on, we are looking into it but those don't have any security implications so they are not a high priority.  You need to talk to your IT.  Either they will assist with a compromise or explain why you can't get what you want and thank you for bringing your co-workers none working policy to light.
Don't get him involved get this to Fox  and Breitbart 
Honestly, apart from SPSS, the most commonly used one is called "R". It's more difficult to use than SPSS and actually requires some programming knowledge, but it's also more powerful than SPSS. You could make the interface easier by installing packages like "JGR" and "Deducer".  Personally, I've never used R so I can't be of much more help than this. R is very well known, so I'd definitely look into it.
They're actually pretty good at retaining their value too.  Type in "Hermès Birkin" in Google and check out what used ones go for.  Want to buy a house? Forget, invest in Hermès bags instead. Hahaha
Girl? Is that on the market? I hope it's not price fixed
I'll say yes, but it means nothing
Yes I completely agree, Karjakin played an excellent match and definitely gave Magnus a run for his money. 
He was only a joke to about half of the people that voted, minus 2 million votes or so but considering the US has over 300 million people it's a pretty low percentage. 
Censoring something is different than giving people the option to block posts from something they don't want to look at.
Nothing sinister at all. I just think the choices made for these promotions are poor. Similar to the decision made on how to go about the Razer promotion. The follow up to remedy to the poor outcome only slightly fixed its shortcoming to begin with.  I'm all for attracting new players. However, this promotion hasn't made more likely to do something that I've already done to begin with.
Yes, there definitely is a replacement!  You could use the Ice Golem instead as it deals with Tombstones, Skeleton army and when combined with a Zap even Minions. Right now I am still trying to get my Ice Golem up to tournament standard so I have yet to see the full potential, but overall it is such a versatile card.  A simple Ice Golem Graveyard combo can catch your opponent of guard for indstance.  You should try it out and see if it works for you
It looks like it was taped from the inside.  That dude could be looking at breaking and entering charges.
I like it.  It feels very cartoony.
It's a troll.  A very Well written troll.  Likes these  https://www.navytimes.com/story/military/2015/11/04/west-point-grad-pranks-annapolis-go-army-day/75165752/  https://www.buzzfeed.com/NemethOH/someone-posted-these-midshiperson-facts-all-over-h0qe
I've always been using adblock.
Let's set aside all of these things on Yuri, Viktor, and Yurio for a moment... because damn, JJ's mom is hot.  Also, **Incest!!! On Ice**. That or they just love each other as sibling...  Damn I kinda miss Georgi's performance.
That was great, then you went and grabbed another blue lol
&gt; 128 tick makes no sense in MM and updating a game is usually harder on code you didn't write   *Good Point. I'm not a developer or work in game company so I don't have any solid info.*  &gt; But hey, reddit knows best because you know how companies work, am I rite?  *You do realise you are writing this on REDDIT? So does this mean what you said previously is an assumption or a lie?*
tank for a draft loaded with guards when you already have a top 5 backcourt in the nba with both players about to enter their primes 🤔
I wish I hadn't lost the instruction manual for **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year**.  White people like **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year**.  I don't care what people say, **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year** is not a crime.  I think I need to take Fluffums to puppy training: he has this terrible habit of **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year**.  You are not alone. Millions of Americans struggle with **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year** every day.  To prepare for his upcoming role, Daniel Day-Lewis immersed himself in the world of **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year**.  After blacking out during New Year&amp;apos;s Eve, I was awoken by **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year**.  During high school I never really fit in until I found **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year** club.  There was a riot at the Gearbox panel when they gave the attendees **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year**.  Experts say that without careful management and conservation, **That case of food poisoning you got from the same caterer last year** will disappear within our lifetimes
Checks out.
Concern Trolling!
You don't :/
I think the biggest factor is 4th quarter come backs and game winning drives 
I never really liked GnR due to my inability to take Asshole Rose seriously after seeing his hilarious concert ejections. But I've grown to respect them regardless.
Do you think it's a YouTube issue?
Best and most direct to the point title ever. 100% Truth with no brakes!
Dude, it's a private site, they can do whatever the fuck they want.  
His voice is so soothing.
When I'm mad at my guy I go sleep on the couch to be away from him. 
Could we do it though? Maybe like some sort of chip that kills sperm or something? I'm not a doctor just a dreamer.
Background: Was looking for a OTP app for OSX for a project, found this review and thought it too hilarious to pass up.
As I recall they were playing middle school kickers as linebackers or something like that, they were so injured.
I'm sorry but you're wrong. They use a joint system of dedicated and listen servers. Most matches are on dedicated. If servers are jammed, the match might switch to listen. It's why you hardly see any host migrations. They've been using this method for years.
&gt; This is not a rant rito pls nerf post.  &gt; Tl;dr Yasuo's Kit is extremly overtuned and needs to turned down a bit.  Pick one
Ironically - *La Tortura* by Shakira is quite pleasant. 
No. nobody is even saying that.
I gotta look, my kids have seen it, but I must not have been paying attention! 
Can I just say that I barely scraped by in Organic Chemistry as a Bio major and this thread giving me flashbacks right now lol
When you try to sound smart, but then display a complete misunderstanding of how social media works.
&gt;Is there anything you’d like to know or ask James Shaw, Metiria Tūrei, Eugenie Sage, Steffan Browning….**and me?**
Sick research, nerds.
What kind of paypal rate are you looking for?
Nope. The Lab. It has many different experiences in one perfectly made package.
i keep getting spammed by this shit  Is there a way to block it or remove it from my analytics?
Second-to-last team gets to pick your team name and logo for the following season. Makes for a lot of fun when the weekly power rankings gets sent to everyone's work emails.
What's a good synonym to mean literally and to mean not an exaggeration? Considering literally is being used as an exaggeration which is the complete opposite of its literal definition.  http://www.thesaurus.com/browse/literal offers horrible alternatives to use.  So what's a good alternative to mean, despite what seems like an exaggeration, actually happened?
Right, so the public system does need work. I think if you apply the same logic to that, that system would ultimately be fixed as well. Common core is such a dangerous thing. I'm not even advocating full privatization but more or less let the schools do what they want and compete via a voucher system maybe. Let them experiment and then other schools can adopt good practices. I feel we're choking the life out of them now and while throwing money at them just to watch the fire get bigger.
For me it's frustrating because my family would probably be in a much better position now if I had taken out loans and not had my tuition paid in full. My parents were really generous, and refinanced their home so I could go to college without debt. I wish that I would have taken out loans instead so that they could afford to move into a safer home for them as they age, rather than needing to pay for the place their in for 9 more years. :/
I'd probably go with the harpy girl.  She's cute and seems interested.  Cow girl is a close second, but I don't like the idea of not being able to date her exclusively.
Congrats dude! Praise Zapdos-.-/
RIP sweet prince
Reminds me of Luanne on RHONY and her fiance Tom.
I cannot BELIEVE she is saying they can't live in Anderson because they need to live in a nice neighborhood. Their rental is worth about $330,000 according to the internet, and there are plenty of houses worth this, and more, near Leah (although I will say I thought they lived in Noblesville!). These nouveau riche hillbillies just want to say they live in Geist, which like I have said before on here, unless you are rich enough to live ON the water, was the cool place to live twenty years ago.
I bought 3, but I mean,  what else do kids want for Christmas?
Is this true? If so, why have you been downvoted?
The mess is definitely holiday decorations. I'm going to guess he's climbing the TV to hang up lights or something similar. 
I wouldn't even say he jabs his way to a decision. He just kind clinches and knees his way to...not lose. 
Oooh, the Bob's Burgers cookbook!  I made the Don't Get Crème Fraîche With Me Burger and the Never Been Feta (Foot Feta-ish) Burger for my blog.   I"m pretty sure that cookbook can do no wrong.
Personally, I think making it a race between people that have added some prestige in the last 10 minutes to be preferable to a race with someone sitting on the sidelines waiting for you to finish the prestige job.
He doesn't look the same. I'm pretty sure that has more to do with TRT though.
Way to make someone dealing with an anxiety attack feel 100x worse....film them while they try to abort episode . If anything your the#weird one for filming the poor lady randomly .
Im Am dat boi
Direct links to images are not allowed; as such, your post has been removed.  Please submit your post as a [discussion (self) post](/r/Overwatch/submit?selftext=true) with some context. If you're submitting fanart, you may link directly to a DeviantArt page, ArtStation portfolio, blog, etc.  If you're submitting a Play of the Game or other Highlight, you'll need to use a Video/GIF host such as YouTube or Gfycat.  Imgur posts are automatically removed, even if its a GIFV, as we're not able to detect which type it is.  [Please see the subreddit rules for more information.](/r/Overwatch/wiki/rules) Thanks! *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Overwatch) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Funny, I launch the game thinking it'll run better and ...*this* is the thing I see when I go into the options menu.  https://imgur.com/a/6K45e
I ordered straight away,  i just knew exactly what to get. I can't wait for my match to get it, but I'm so nervous. I hope I have done a good job. Yay for you restoring your Santas faith! 
No. 
^i ^know ^this ^isn't ^related ^but ^^i ^^love ^^your ^^name
You are very welcome!
sure thing
0 cuz no Region Exclusives in South America. I cri -_-
I asked my mom if we could buy that pizza for dinner and she told me pizza doesn't really do that :( 
That's what I was planning on doing, I've seen them pull out those signs before just wasn't sure if this was an event that would have them or not. 
Bro, shes perfect 
if they're only allowed to spend the excess and they're required to fund national defence and policing and criminal justice, it doesn't leave a whole lot for them to piss away, especially if you also don't allow them to issue massive debts.
Echo everything said—smoking hot!
I'm still leveling him up and I'll let the experts comment on his tier compare to others but he seems like a fun character to play with :D 
It's another Unreal Engine 4 disaster for AMD.   No DX11 Unreal Engine 4 game has EVER ran well on AMD and when you look at the reasons why...  https://developer.nvidia.com/unrealengine  &gt;"Epic developed Unreal Engine 4 on NVIDIA hardware, and it looks and runs best on GeForce." -Tim Sweeney, founder, CEO and technical director of Epic Games.  https://developer.nvidia.com/nvidia-gameworks-and-ue4  https://blogs.nvidia.com/blog/2015/11/09/gameworks-vr-unreal-engine-4-ue4/  WTF do you expect?  This is why sites like [H] and Kyle has been bashing AMD for poor performance in VR games...  which happen to be mostly Unreal Engine 4 indie games.  Unreal Engine 4 is basically GimpWorks &amp; NV sponsored to the max.
The Dragon Balls
http://blog.oup.com/2015/01/klansville-usa-david-cunningham-ku-klux-klan/   &gt;By most straightforward measures, the KKK appears a failed social movement. Despite the Klan’s political inroads during the 1920s, when millions of its members succeeded in electing hundreds of KKK-backed candidates to local, state, and even federal office, the group proved unable to preserve its influence at the ballot box beyond that decade. Later KKK waves have never been able to deliver on promises to rebuild this influential Klan voting bloc. Bob Jones’ Carolina Klan came the closest to winning such influence, with mainstream candidates currying favor (sometimes publicly, and more often covertly at Klan rallies and other events) with Jones and other leaders in 1964 and 1968. But that effort appeared short-lived, with both Jones and the Carolina Klan all but disappearing by the early 1970s. 
OK, so I feel like it's now officially not racist to say WWE is engaging in serious tokenism on their announce teams. But weirdly, only one specific kind of tokenism.  That said, I am looking forward to seeing what he's got.
Shower regularly. Loofahs are good because they exfoliate your skin, removing dead skin cells.  Wash your hair *as often as your hair type needs.* (This is important. Your hair type may require really frequent or really infrequent washes.)  Remove any body hair your want to. (Optional)  Take care of your nails! Trim, clip, use serum if you want. Nail health is a pretty forgotten indicator of overall health. Watch for discoloration, weakness, etc.  For makeup, check out YouTube, /r/makeupaddiction for inspiration, or /r/makeupeducation for help with the basics.   Wear sunscreen all the time. Even if you don't burn. 
Radio replacement: it is always a good idea to disconnect the battery when replacing a stereo or anything else electric on a car. The gear shift is a physical issue: in park it blocks the old radio unit from coming out. Putting the car in low gear just gets the shifter handle out of the way. I usually shift out of park when I'm to the point of removing the deck, and then put it back when done to reduce the possibilities of rolling. Backlight issues: Infiniti backlights for the climate control modules are easy enough to replace, but hard to find. I ordered a bunch of wrong sized bulbs before I gave up. Back to the radio: be sure to buy a new deck which has the 4 pre-amp level outputs (2 front, 2 rear) and get the proper Metra adapter harness. Cut and splice doesn't work very well on these cars. The Bose speakers are self-amplified and a line-level converter adds extra air noise to the system more often than not. And stick with quality name brand receivers. 
As long as my prize isn't a high  midichlorian count child destined to murder young padawans one day. 
Lol same wtf. Can you dm your name and stuff. I can prove it too there
The score seems to be CS:GO but tbh 4000hours in the game I can't really remember seeing this on NA server. Definitely on SEA server though.
This is real, it's from Justice League Unlimited. I think Wonder Woman needed to get The Atom past some sentry robots so he could then shrink further and disable the computer core from the inside.
anti-gay advocates as well.
Not only intrusive, weirdly prudish (one wonders if he wants the age of consent to be 18), but also staggeringly technologically illiterate. These two sum it up best for me:  &gt;there is technology that can identify sexually explicit pictures and prevent it being transmitted.  &gt;I ask myself why we can’t identify cyberbullying when it happens on social media platforms by word pattern recognition, and then prevent it happening.  Because that technology simply does not exist. 
You could turn it back on him and ask why he doesn't believe in every thing that has the same level of evidence as Christianity.
Is in the NW wildlands outside of Broverly Golf course. The roads that go there are decayed or bridges are out.
If I'll be remembered for something on this sub, it'll be for defending Gyarados. I love mine as an all-around attacker. He has few weaknesses that show up in gyms. No one really puts Electric types in gyms. Recently, Rhydon with Stone Edge or Golem with Rock Throw or Stone Edge are possible defenders, but he still destroys them with Hydro Pump so that's not too many points docked from him.  He resists Vaporeon, which is very important. Bite is SE against Exeggutor, a popular defender I see a lot, and he's great as a Water type that isn't weak to Grass. He resists Fire Fang and Steel Wing, too, and is neutral taking damage from Lapras and Snorlax. Dealing damage, he doesn't get STAB on Bite but it's still a very fast and high DPS move, and he has a good Attack stat to back it up. Hydro Pump does a ton of damage, and I find it's more effective from Gyarados than Vaporeon. Gyarados has decent enough health, tankier than Golduck or Starmie, and I find he can last quite a while against enemy gyms.  I often use him over Vaporeon because I prefer his Hydro Pump (to be fair, all my good Vaporeons have Water Pulse at the moment), and because he's far better against Grass types like Exeggutor and sometimes Venusaur. The higher Attack somewhat makes up for the lack of STAB on Bite vs Water Gun, especially if he has Hydro Pump that *is* getting STAB.  As for defending gyms, he's pretty awful; I teamed up with a friend today using &gt;1900 Jolteons against two &gt;2400 Gyarados. We killed both of them before they could even use their charge moves or get us down more than a third of our health. Even Arcanine usually lasts longer, as he doesn't have a double weakness.
I love having so much privilege. My smug enjoyment of quietly and privately chuckling at posts of this nature is a true joy. Thanks for posting OP. 
Pidgees! Haven't seen a single one in gym but they're BAD ass
Sleeved. And with the room for another 200 cards, it should fit all the new content being squeezed in, like the Oxidized Gear and Gold Smoke Knight
I could tell you were on stims just by looking at this wall of text. The important thing is to develop proper habits because the initial magic wears off
Homeless everywhere, don't move here. Bad idea.
Logic keeps me on a Mac too. In fact, if I didn't make music at the level that I do, I'd probably only own mobile devices. Only thing I wouldn't be able to do is torrent, but Androids can do that, right?
Free Advice: Go lift heavy weights.  Channel that inner rage into something positive.  Every time you feel like giving up, and you think you can't make it to the gym or lift one more rep or do one more set, just think about how you felt at your lowest, and realize that moving the weight is the best cure for that.  
Willing to do one year of plus for 40?
eh?  "preach it from the ~~mountain~~ rooftops" is literally a quote from Jesus (Matthew 10:27)  However in a pre-massmedia era that was the commonly accepted way to spread any kind of news. Obviously the gospel pretty much has "don't be inconsiderate" at its core though 
And the United States of America. And its territories. And allies.
Ohhh looord I wanna gooo..
Which is what we desperately need right now. 
To be honest, I've been bowing since the bow was introduced and I just found out about "critical distance" a month ago. However, I'm never not near the monster.
Not at all necessary. Psych 1 is general psych, whereas psych 10 is stats for psych. Have you taken any stats classes? You'll definitely be fine. 
Send me your address, usual daily dose, and strain preference. I'll mail some out tomorrow :)
He only spoke English though lol
Really trying to do that over at r/accountingstudents 
Make a forge. 
I beg to differ and nominate my mother in law.
I wanted one of those so badly.
GG EZ
The game is definitely worth it. I've finished the main story but i've found myself going back and doing everything else because it was that exciting. I don't usually  go back so I'd definitely recommend.
They have such sights to show you!
In my Opinion Skyrim is 1000x better
No, some phones are a bitch to screenshot with.
There was a headsculpt of Ed Harris. The eyes were already on (I think most companies use decals for them) but they were kind of dull, so I just hit em with some gloss. On the hatted version, I'll be handpainting them.
Yes I always refer to lvl 30 stats unless I specify :).  
&gt;It’s time to stop mourning the New York Cosmos  No, the team still has fans and it sucks to lose your team. 
If you want an actual Hard of Hearing person's opinion on issues with Overwatch, I've got a few. As far as support goes, I generally don't rely on the sounds, I'm looking at everybody's health bar. Most d/Deaf/Hoh are used to relying more on visual cues, so a Mercy health bar would be nice on Zen. The real issues for me stem from Sombra's ult and Ana's sleep, which do not mix with Tinnitus, and directional sounds disappearing with mono audio. 
Welcome to Chennai :)  &gt;I can read sentences in Tamil but because my vocabulary is appallingly limited, I have no idea what I'm even reading.  It's really cool that you can read Tamil already. I've met a lot of natives who cannot read.  For learning to speak, the more you are immersed in the language, the faster you will absorb. Try and use the words you know into simple sentences and the grammar should follow soon.  Also try to have simple conversations with people around you, like a friend, neighbor or coworker. You could also allot a few minutes a day to listen to news in Tamil or maybe watch a youtube video with subtitles turned on (e.g. [Put Chutney](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCn2wC753SXLd2BJYLss_jlA)).  &gt;is the variant of Tamil spoken in Chennai ('Chennai Bashai') really different from the Tamil spoken in the rest of TN   Yes, you will hear different regional accents as you move within the state. For example, Chennai Tamil is often perceived as slightly crass when compared to other southern districts, Madurai Tamil has a slightly rustic feel to it, Coimbatore Tamil is known for its respectful tone and Tamil from southwestern districts often share words with Malayalam.   &gt;and in other countries like Sri Lanka, Singapore, Malaysia etc?  The difference here gets slightly more stark. From what I've observed, Sri Lankan Tamil sounds like the pure form of Tamil like in old movies and their enunciation feels quite pleasing to the ear. A movie which highlights these differences is [Kannathil Muthamittal](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kannathil_Muthamittal). Watch it if you find time.  Happy learning.
&gt; I want to believe Amoris Laetitia is consistent with Church teaching, but if it is, why does the pope have such a difficult time clarifying that consistency?  I think the answer here is "we don't know yet, but this is the direction we would like to move towards." The Pope won't give a clarification likely because he doesn't have one. At least not yet. He seems to be unwilling to do the thinking himself (to be fair, he's no great teacher like JP2 or theologian like B16. He's a priest before he's pope) so he'd rather have an "organic" change... One kickstarted by kicking a hornet's nest, sure, but an organic change nonetheless. He's not stupid, but he is a bit petulant. 
The_Donald would welcome some counter trolling if anyone had actual game, but anonymously violating the platform itself isn't a "funny joke" and it's astounding that you even could think it is.
3 cc1 for trinity 
read up a little bit, one of the links shows that the judge was truly overstepping judicial boundaries with some of his statements.   also, say that same question in a singsongy tone, in a sincere tone, in any tone, it still doesnt sound any better. 
It's time to go to your safe space now.....
I hope so. She's already been influenced by it a bit given her fight with Alibaba but maybe all is not lost.
Hmm, berserker+abyssus+life seems like begging for death
Pretty spot on! I actually started becoming more active on reddit because i feel like coming here and being kind and helpful sort of validates my existence 😅
See, that's my assumption-- that people on the internet are weird. But then I see folks online griping about weird people, and I remember non-weird people are on the internet, too. Which is weird. I guess not being "weird" can be a quirk as well.
Saxton Hale, the super Australian from the r/tf2 lore - More like Sexton Hale, I guess  ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) 
But snopes said no go zones don't exist! /s
Well it's been quite some work to look them all up!  Yeah, a friend of mine is visiting over Christmas/NYE and I want to make us a nice themed stash of munchies food, so here I am! Definitely adding the aforementionned on my list, tho.
This year, last place has to eat a Carolina Reaper pepper. 
I don't think it will charge the Volt any faster, as it's the same voltage as a regular outlet (~120v), and I don't believe there is a way for the Volt to draw more current at 120v. 
Would you ever do a live show? I think that would be cool. 
I said first piece, not top piece.
Judge Rinder, to my mind, is even worse than Jeremy Kyle. He is by no accounts qualified to hand down the cases, and at no point do they explain that the rulings are legally binding only technically. Not to mention the absolutely horribly egotistical mess that Mr Rinder himself is, luxuriating in the sound of his own voice and the power he gets over others. Also his persona (at least I hope it's a persona) doesn't do any favours to a career already viewed as full of unscrupulous types.
@heybudbud I'm going to assume your talking about his reply to my post? If so I'm glad I'm not alone on this "I'm playing WoW to have fun with friends and maybe even raid a tad, but not end all be all HARDCORE raider" boat. I don't understand why my simple post would offend anyone enough to add a response like OP managed to do. Like I said I'm just trying to get into the community a bit but obviously I'm not HARDCORE enough to play vanilla. 
"Ah can't. Ah... Ah simply can't."
I feel like this isn't supposed to be an option. =/
I've seen many dogs named Loki, but this little fella IS Loki!
Because why not? Not everyone wants to take a conventional route. The loot is surely covered by insurance and you never know what this man has gone through. This is a victimless crime. 
**/u/SPEZ IS LITERALLY THE BIGGEST** fan of absolutely 100% ***not*** censoring people!   *This comment has been modified from its original version. It has been formatted to fit the narrative of this website.*
#[THIS TRAIN HAS NO BRAKES, AND IT WON'T BE RUNNING OUT OF STEAM ANY TIME SOON! THE TRUMP TRAIN JUST GOT 1 BILLION MPH FASTER!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hgM2xN5TPgw#4800385117000)  #CURRENT SPEED: 4,800,385,117,000 MPH!  At that rate, it would take approximately 349.251 years to travel to the Andromeda Galaxy (2.5 million light-years)! ^^^^A ^^^^bot ^^^^by ^^^^/u/BotsByLiam. ^^^^Please [^^^^use ^^^^this ^^^^form](http://botsbyliam.com) ^^^^or ^^^^visit ^^^^/r/BotsByLiam ^^^^to ^^^^report ^^^^errors ^^^^or ^^^^make ^^^^suggestions!
Yes, yes they do. As a person from the heart of trumpistan ohio, They think obama is a kenyan muslim sent by al-queda to found isis with the help of the clintons. Because they hate our freedom. Now go ahead and tell me that trump voters aren't racist. I have the two years of daily experience that says otherwise. 
you were 6 levels abough him, but did like 0 dmg to him. try rageblade. it got buffed and you don't have to waste like 2 k for health that is unnecessary on kayle
Oh boy those toplane fights are way more thrilling than that shitty new ult, especially when their jungler comes.
http://i.imgur.com/LtVUncv.gif
Good.
My shoulders and back feel better at a lighter weight. Much better!
Aubrey's new movie that she stars in, "Ingrid Goes West", is nominated for best U.S. Dramatic film at the 2017 Sundance Film Festival.
It's funny, because I am sure someone told you burning rainbow flags was a crime and your dumb brain actually believed that. 
Ya gotta!
I only took 1 independent study class as an undergraduate at UNC, but a took a handful of classes in law school where I did nothing but show up and take the test. As for UNCG, it takes some brass to insult Carolina athletes when  our revenue sport student-athletes have incoming test scores better than those in the UNCG freshman profile.  
Yeah, I'm with you there. I go into some games, like Fallout New Vegas, and I'm like... wtf was I doing? Only to spend the next two hours bumbling around like two blind virgins, still not knowing what my next task was.
  Snapshots:  1. *This Post* - [archive.org](https://web.archive.org/20161201000004/http://www.reddit.com/r/TrollXChromosomes/comments/5fq7ns/hifw_i_am_in_the_middle_of_getting_divorced_and/), [megalodon.jp](http://megalodon.jp/2016-1201-0900-05/www.reddit.com/r/TrollXChromosomes/comments/5fq7ns/hifw_i_am_in_the_middle_of_getting_divorced_and/), [ceddit.com](http://www.ceddit.com//r/TrollXChromosomes/comments/5fq7ns/hifw_i_am_in_the_middle_of_getting_divorced_and/), [_archive.is\*_](https://archive.is/?url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2FTrollXChromosomes%2Fcomments%2F5fq7ns%2Fhifw_i_am_in_the_middle_of_getting_divorced_and%2F&amp;run=1 "could not auto-archive; click to resubmit it!")  *^(I am a bot.) ^\([*Info*](/r/SnapshillBot) ^/ ^[*Contact*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot))*
Its all good man. Got a laugh out of it
😱😱😱😱😱😱
Would totally go.
I think his scaling is hella good now though cause 18 orbs is just a shitload
Education and consumer goods are not the same thing.  Everyone deserves access to higher education. If nothing else it improves our society, our ability to think critically, and expands the scope of our worldviews.   Without it we'd be better off dismantling our democracy. There is no effective democracy without a well educated populace. 
Like Trump, you guys have developed both a superiority and victim complex...truly bizarre. Anyway, why do you think reddit should be "fair"? You've come to a left leaning website and you're surprised when you aren't welcomed with open arms....Also it probably wasn't wise to send death threats to the CEO. It doesn't really help your case.   For the record I didn't bring up 'safe spaces' but its true, I think there is a some serious irony and hypocrisy that the tough guy conservatives have their little space where no one is allowed to show dissent against their dear leader. 
Yep. Cheaper fees. Also, VGS already is a big percentage mostly US stocks, actually. I don't know why I thought about getting a US only one. 
k..
Think it was some type of Cyber deal, I got a marketing email this week for it. Got any more pics?
lol I was only jesting, i'm sure everyone has been with someone that ended up being a bit of a tard. Life is for the living, grab whatever bit of fun you can at any moment, tomorrow you could be struck by a bus.
From: https://www.stoamigo.com/pricing/  http://i.imgur.com/9KVHxG0.png  So you're charging me for storage on my own machine?  And telling me I can't use more than 2gb of my own machine unless I pay you on a reoccurring basis?
The ACC isn't that good. It's hardly an interesting debate.
Oh wow, I remember this. Especially in servers; admins and server mods would ask why my base is so dark, i.e. it was a giveaway that I was using a hacked client like Nodus as it had fullbright 
Have you seen her tanlines? It's so over the top and it's kind of a bummer.
This is nothing but a attempt by spez and the intolerant left to silence those with other opinions and spread hate 
Man, I was so angry that he got it over JJTBC. Thanks for the validation!
The UT set with Manus will be more playable.
Still trying to make the talon? I don't have a HR armor set yet, but I have plenty of Deviljho experience from other games and a few free hrs tonight. I'll gladly help you claim a hub.
Don't be ridiculous. Those compartments are spring loaded. Any bread would be catapulted up into the air. The elements seem to for heating. My guess is some form of weapon. Possibly a home defence device. 
That's correct. 
That's an affirmative ghostrider.
Thanks ever so much , i would love to have a chance to win this thanks again
What you do with your body is not your boyfriends dad's business. Period. No exceptions.   He would be within his rights to say that he will not allow you to live there if you become pregnant, but he has NO SAY in how you prevent a pregnancy. If your boyfriend will not stand up for you, he is not a good boyfriend. He does not respect your right to make your own healthcare decisions and I cannot overemphasize how important that is.
And its facing a food crisis because they kicked out all the white people...who were growing all the food. Also, for an example of why africa cannot be left in the care of africans and remain prosperous, one need look no farther than Johannesburg. When apartheid ended it took no more than a few years for things to fall apart.
It's rarely used.  You would see stop-loss, increased high year of tenure, and ramped up recruitment efforts before you saw a draft.  Having two hair standards is a bigger deal than this.
0 and I am pretty sure I already maxed out at 16 years 
There's this now https://twitter.com/BrianBilek_/status/804109053349732355
You are not my professor; you are my MadWorld power-up.
yes so why would he pick lfy in 5 categories!? most kill avg? most kills in a game? most assists in a game? pls let me LUL
Ask if you'd ride her or will she be riding you. Her answer should clear things out, unless she's into strap ons. 
Is it? Can you be prosecuted for it? The only way I think it would be s hate crime would be if you were doing it to deliberately threaten or intimidate someone. I'm sure you'd be prosecuted if you burned an American flag outside of a veteran's house
If someone responded that way I likely wouldn't even notice. I would not take personal offense. A thanks from me is more of an absent-minded one anyways. Said out of habit, not because I expect certain words in return.
https://www.tirerack.com/tires/tires.jsp?tireMake=Kumho&amp;tireModel=Ecsta+V720+ACR&amp;sidewall=Blackwall&amp;partnum=925YR9V720ACR&amp;tab=Sizes  The ACR version of those Kumhos still has a treadwear rating of 200. But when it comes to any trackday tire the treadwear rating kind of becomes meaningless. Very loosely regulated, someone can use a higher number to pretend their tires are more durable and streetworthy (or cheat their way into racing specs that dictate &gt;200 rating) or alternatively use a lower number to show off how sticky their tires are over a competitor. You know what's weird? The 60-rated Pirelli Corsa has quite a bit more usable tread pattern and quite a bit less dry grip than a 180-rated Michelin Sport Cup 2, but the hyper aggressive and nearly slick Pirelli Trofeo R is also rated at 60 treadwear.   A Corvette Z06 riding on Michelin Sport Cup 2s will pull more G on a skidpad or in a low speed corner than an ACR on Kumho ACR-spec V720s (1.18G vs 1.14G, as per [Motor Trend](http://www.motortrend.com/cars/dodge/viper/2016/2016-chevrolet-corvette-z06-vs-2016-dodge-viper-acr-vs-2016-porsche-911-gt3-rs/)), but the Z06 doesn't have as much of the downforce that allows an ACR to pull higher G in faster turns.   So all this BS about the Viper being on essentially cheater slicks and pretending that other trackday/R-comp tires are at a disadvantage somehow really needs to be put to bed.
Good, our differences are settled. And I really hope Mike Pence outlaws abortion, even though me, myself would vote to keep abortion safe and legal. I prefer the other side because there is humanity there and absolutely none with people like you. Of course, the answer to that would be because the fetus is not a human. Respond again, begging me for sympathy.
Tftg! 
So I get to support my team and stay addicted to heroin? Win-win.
Global it's literally only one week behind.
Well maybe Breitbart could build a better forum separate from their news site. 
It feels weird if the word "Hero" in that notice does not refer to "the hero side" but turns out to be a villain.  (c.c. /u/veb7)
I thought financial stability was not having enough money to become a pilot. My fault lol
I guess I should take more xanax and try to make this sub better?
Dementia.  But I hope a heart attack or stroke takes me first.  And after a certain age, I won't seek treatment for cancer or similar fatal illnesses should they happen to me, only palliative care. 
r/conspiracy is talking about the largest, most public conspiracy theory possibly *ever*, which is still on-going? You don't say.
adblock engaged, screw them.
Yes, in terms of whether or not they were incapacitated. Not BAC. 
We don't have one here. I'm on an Army base. Fort Leonard Wood
&gt; of avengers fame Or when I was growing up, of Buffy the Vampire Slayer fame. I honestly think it kicks Avengers ass. Maybe firefly, too, but that's like trying to choose my favorite kid. I love them both so much. And Dollhouse, underrated Whedon gem. 
[Today's Theme: Favorite Trios!](http://i.imgur.com/xfOpWkW.jpg)   **Bonus 3x3s**   [Guys](http://i.imgur.com/Zvpcr6R.jpg) and [Girls](http://i.imgur.com/El56eFr.jpg) who are second bests from their respective series   [Favorite Powers](http://i.imgur.com/r3nrE23.jpg) BIG spoilers for Hunter x Hunter and Fullmetal Alchemist: Brotherhood on this, also slight Boku no Hero Academia manga spoilers.   Once again inspired by /u/ShaKing807, [Favorite Quotes!](http://i.imgur.com/AWCCbgc.jpg) (guide below because I'm an idiot who forgot to include names)   [Mystery](http://i.imgur.com/HK195Qk.jpg) [Answer](/s "K Names")   [Album of all of my 3x3s/collages](http://imgur.com/a/vebOE)  Favorite | Quotes | Guide ---|---|---- Tyki Mikk - D.Gray-man | Yukino Yukinoshita - OreGairu | Hisoka - Hunter x Hunter Kaiki Deishu - Monogatari | Gintoki Sakata - Gintama | Rider - Fate/Zero Josuke Higashikata - JoJo Part 4 | Ladd Russo - Baccano! | Tooru Oikawa - Haikyuu!!
**Thanks for helping out the community with your review! Feedback is always helpful!**  If you haven't, please be sure to provide pictures to go along with your review. The greater detail the better! Just be sure to censor them for personal info. Some image hosts like [Imgur](https://www.imgur.com) have an editing feature built in. You can also use Photoshop or, if you don't have it, a free alternative like: [GIMP](http://www.gimp.org/), [Pinta](https://pinta-project.com/pintaproject/pinta/), [Paint.net](http://www.getpaint.net/index.html), or [MyPaint](http://mypaint.org/downloads/).  #Thanks!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/fakeid) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I doubt any of them have read "The Doctrine of Fascism" or even know who Mussolini is.
emails are automated based on ship station. I'm sure they've pre printed labels.
What the fuck man, some posts there with 2k upvotes.  The MSM (including reddit) is doing everything they can to stump the Trump.  To bad mother fuckers, you're already STUMPED!
I saw the slowmo it's probably because of the concussion.
lease teslas, dont buy them.  and you already know whether or not you can afford it.
o rly?
That music was anything but high quality.
&gt; The city that I live in here in South Carolina passed a law that makes it illegal to toot your horn at someone that is stopped at a traffic light or stop sign.  Liar.  What city, and post a citation to the law.  Liar.
Do you have any flower-giving tips for people courting outside of Iceland?
mom jeans with a zipper on the back
tl;dr (dw?)  Kingsglaive: The capital of Insomnia (home city of Noctis) is attacked by the Empire of Nifflheim during the signing of the peace treaty. NIfflheim destroys the city and kills King Regis - Noctis' father.  Brotherhood:  Noctis - lazy and arrogant prince, who was fed from a silver spoon. Taught to fight by gladio. Or at least one of the trainers was gladio.  Gladio - has a little sister Iris. His father is the Shield of the King (aka King Regis). Gladio is a tough guy with a heart of gold.  Ignis - a literal robot who only cares about Noctis being more serious and cooking for Noctis. He has no background. (I am not kidding, he literally gets 0 character developement).  Prompto - was a fat chubby kid who wanted to be friends with Noctis in like school. Decided to stop being fat so Noctis-sama notices him, sempai. Loses a ton of weight and makes friends with Noctis in high school.  That's all.
Thanks a lot for the extra good points!
lul Hi random readers, random subreddit Imma make about mapping coding plugins and cool fun stuff :)
Well, name any "popular" youtuber that does DS 3 and uses the meta like it's going out of style. *this is my honest opinion, idc bout the hate &lt;3*
A couple of questions about Dice Masters:  * How do you like the current design of the game? * Do you feel that the number of sets being pushed is at a good place? * Why the insane rarities?
I didnt watch the video but doesnt this create imput lag? Super  Mario bros 2 and TLoZ LA is already hard enough. 
Be careful, a picture of a child will just turn on /u/spez. After all we all know /u/spez is a pedophile
My pharmacist wants to know how many you do per week. 
&gt;She sought it out. Show me proof to the contrary.   We weren't talking about that, it's irrelevant to our discussion. You're moving the goal posts to try to "win" this argument. 
Yes.
"No Was was closed. Once was shut down it reopened as Closed." "Closed is open." "No Closed is closed" "I don't know. Third base, right?"
True; typically, by the time we get into a Line of Defense server, the JPEGs are already burning.
I meant on the actual Batman title, not Grayson.  And I don't think either the Rebirth issue or the #1 issue for Batman were particularly great.
The Malazan military force has got to be up there. That empire spanned whole continents.
These sound like deeper issues more than the name of a blush or lipstick. I don't think she meant for you to get this offended over orgasms. 
The point is that it's enshrined in law that the victim doesn't have to fight or otherwise physically try to stop a rapist. So the question is irrelevant in the law. If you look at the whole transcript, the bigger transgression is that this judge openly says he doesn't agree with that part of the law. The report from the review committee reflects this. The main issue they point out is hid disregard for parts of law, which he rejected and used instead his own opinion/reasoning/"common sense". In this situation, he is not allowed to do that.
Same
Still can't believe last few weeks people said Jenkinson is better than Debuchy. Jenkinson is not good enough for Arsenal right now.   I'm also not comfortable with Gabriel in RB, but that's probably our best bet since Debuchy is probably out.
Nice try gold thief!
I used to get stuck in traffic a lot. If someone was getting particularly annoying, getting too close, not paying attention, laying on the horn for no reason, whatever, I would fire up my laptop, put on the most horrific porn you can think of, then point the laptop out of my vehicle so they had no choice but to watch it. The looks were amazing, and nine times out of ten the asshole in question would back off.  Yes, I planned this in advance. My friends and I took great glee in finding the most awful things to download.
wow. ermines and least weasels look so similar. 
No, his hands still get wet. Goddamn that's shitty advice...
i wonder what barry would do if iris slept with oliver.
I see it at 109...
I hope he gets away with it.
Sure... but what if instead you played a card which meant you wouldn't have to resort to spending an entire turn removing the board and taking 5 face damage. also, if anything survives the fire; even a small death rattle, you're in for a pretty big world of hurt.
You claim "looses something"...  "There is no deficit or surplus: like cutting up sandalwood, each piece is it."  You claim "your translation".... I got this translation from a post of yours. Have you been relying on faulty translations? Or are you choking on notions of self and others?
A pair of fallopian tubes
Going out and finding someone else did not work in my experience. But hanging out with my best friend did, so if that's an option to for it. Go crazy.
And the winner is...nobody.   But for real. If somebody wants these, just PM me and I will send them to you. 
I had a friend that got married in OK on the same day of OU/TEX. He was a Jayhawk fan, and bball season hadn't started yet. 
NO BRAKES!
Just had to send mine in because of same problems. Send it in for warranty.
Amazon Snowball is a state of the art  truck(s) that can download and backup 1 exabyte of data in about 6 months.  As of 2014, the storage capacity of the internet was around 1 million exabytes. Let's say it's doubled by now. It would take Amazon about 1 million years to back up the internet. Either my math is wrong or Canada is crazy. 
You have to see the finish to even play the first two moves, that's the problem. With ~1 minute on a clock it's very hard even for arguably the greatest player of all time. Don't forget as well, that if you blunder, you lose.
As a result I type out those responses instead now to show them I really mean ggez!
We've always been at war with east Asia. 
They both will actually do well in a low tech tank as long as it softer water.
Damn, that's awesome. I wish I had that network adapter back in the day.
Which no one will ever know about, = not a real problem.
Ps4 to Pc player here.  Said on one guys stream after I clutch 4 kill: "No way he's a level 19. Gotta be a smurf account". (I recognized the streamers name and I checked the VODs)  Chat after getting MVP and final kill against level 150+ with gold and plats:  "No way"  "Too noob"  "Hax"  "Reported"  In conclusion. You're gonna be fine. Just prove them wrong.
To be fair, the last shitpost was 17 hours ago. I think it's died down.
Janet Jackson was saying the exact same thing before Michael Jackson was killed. 
All I'm seeing is bubbles/season/possible meat chunks? Doesn't look like plastic or like it's white.
You seemed to come across as greatly caring about this small group dictating policy, context lost in written text I suppose.  This small protest would be OK to lead to a change in policy, because it can start a larger wave of dissent against that government policy, which the major parties cannot ignore. We don't expect the government to move a motion or bill directly after that dismantles the offshore regime - we expect people's thoughts on the issue might change, and on the off-chance, the elected MPs might decide to lead a different public conversation on the issue.  I think virtually no-one is condoning them gluing themselves to chairs, or trying to shut down the Parliament/democracy.  Am I answering your question?
There is a psychology professor at Auburn University who is a young earth creationist. Granted I believe Auburn has the highest rate of churches per block of any public university. 
cant see you
Whats this whats this theres color everywhere whats this theres white things in the air 
Definitely not that cool, he worked on this way too long.
&gt; If you try to defraud me, I can broadcast a transaction that will steal ALL YOUR MONEY, so you have an incentive to NOT defraud me, and the same goes for me.  Why wouldn't someone just do that in the first place?  Seems like there is a lot of trust involved.
It's been well proven. Take your incredulity elsewhere. You're not in the echo chamber here. 
He was waaaaay too aggressive with her.  Forcing himself on her.  Gross.
Didn't they tease the hype bros and vaudevillains last week?
Because he still knows what the investments are. Once he gives it to a firm to liquidate, he doesn't know what he owns or doesn't own. That's the whole idea. The issue isn't what he does for the business directly in his capacity as a businessman but what he does as President to benefit his business. If he knows his assets, he can make Presidential decisions in the best interest of his business directly.  Of course, they won't liquidate it instantly. These firms aren't magic. No one expects that necessarily. But once he signs it over, he won't know what they have or haven't sold or bought yet, and that's the point. 
Wow thx for being a snitch OP now I'll never get this classic commentary ever again https://clips.twitch.tv/imforeverpoverty/FaithfulDuckVaultBoy
That quote reflects drunk me perfectly. 
Were not censored if were still here. We need to get back on track. 
Sent!
If only we could send messages back. 
Yeah, I'm glad we finally got a blaster based on [the Luger P08](https://s19.postimg.org/p5sdfxalf/P08_Luger1917.jpg) with [the A180](https://s19.postimg.org/m0a5pntnl/San_Diego_Comic_Con_2016_Star_Wars_Rogue_One_Exh.jpg) ([here's a better look at it on the packaging of the 12″ Jyn Erso figure](https://s19.postimg.org/ithtjtwwx/51390947_Alt01.png) and [here's another picture of her with it](https://s19.postimg.org/7if5vgq1t/IMG_4126.jpg)), which was built with [an airsoft WE Luger](https://s19.postimg.org/oqh3mwoo3/WE_Luger_P08_6_Barrel.jpg).
I enjoyed AJ calling the Miz 'Michael' on Talking Smack a lot more than I should have.
I'm not "socially fluent" but eye contact is important. I work with a shy woman who never looks at me and it's obvious. 
You're wearing everything you need to already
I think the CO2 graph at the top of [this](http://climate.nasa.gov/evidence/) page is partly what he's talking about. Based on past cycles, we should be well into the cooling phase and headed toward the next ice age, and instead the CO2 levels are literally off the charts in comparison to past cycles.
You might as well steal it because apparently trump has no use for it.
I think it's good right from 28, but Fire Trap/Flame Totem/Firestorm etc. are most likely still faster clear at that point. Really depends. Probably best to just be flexible and swap whenever you have enough links or time it so you swap right after ascending.
208 tickets go on sale Friday and still only one prelim and one lower main card fight announced so far
&gt; So Bastion can often wreck in Competitive not because your team is particularly organized because nobody on the other team will pick anything to counter him, except for the occassional Genji, who is not really a counter to Bastion.  Uhm no, you are just playing with and against bad players, you dont need to play a hero that counters him. You just have to not play like a moron usually, killing a stationary target is not hard. I was saying that Bastion is literally useless, except if you manage to coordinate really well to set him up and even then its mostly the surprise of playing against him that makes him strong, because its unusual. You dont need coordination to kill a Bastion, you need a lot of it to make him stay alive and mobile, because else he is just a shit pick
I've always been a bit of a Mccutchen fan.  He just seems like a ballplayer.  Would love him to be a Redbird!
Dar'yaim emits an audible breath, his eyes straightening out.  *Those shabla hut'uune (fucking cowards).*  "You wanna know why I'm here, not there?  Alright, a friend of mine, small woman, four foot nothing, hull tech, stumbles upon the ISB commander getting it on with an army officer.  That shit doesn't fly over there, and so hull tech compiles a report.  Sure enough she's approached by an ISB officer who demands that she destroy the file, she doesn't destroy that file.  He chases her down to engine deck, meanwhile I'm trying find the both of them, I've only gotten the APB at this point.  I never find either of them, until two days later."  His eyes straighten out, they're full of emotion.  "Sure enough, there she is, covered in blood, and puke.  Now I don't know about you, but I can barely stand for doing that to an enemy, let alone a comrade.  He fucking tortured her for nothing!  The shabla hut'uun walked!  I bombed the court hearing in an attempt to kill him.  Ven Falconer followed me out.  We were captured, tortured, they separated us, feigned killing me.  Eventually I escaped, and set out to find Ven, that led me to your cell.  I'm gonna fight the empire either way, but I'd be much more effective if I did it with all of you."  He was breathing heavily, his eyes were watering, he still couldn't comprehend how Kord could have done that to another Imperial.  *The man has no conscience, he's a damn psychopath.*
How I play Wraith is to cloak from the start and make use of it for the first hit. Then keep up the pressure and run them down before they have a chance to recover by simply running them down. Earning both types of points per chase.  I'll break off to cloak again and maybe find someone else if they manage to start pallet looping or get to much distance/infinite but often enough I find going in and out of cloak for a single chase a waste of time. You give to many chances to heal, give to much time to reach safe(ish) areas, and just don't hunt fast enough when against high skilled Survivors. Once a Survivor is hurt, and Wraith is very good at starting a chase with doing just that, they tend to fuck up a lot more making it a bit more easy to run them down.  Then again, Im a Billy main. Being supper aggressive is how I first learned to play. Make use of speed and stealth to start the chase up close and from odd places then don't back off unless you need to till you down or hook someone. 
I don't think that's necessarily the case. Especially if the girls in question are quite thin themselves. They may still be doing it maliciously, by comparing her to someone bigger, they could "establish" themselves as skinnier and therefore superior, though.
Scamming you how? Personally I do all of my secondhand sales through craigslist. What model is your dad trying to sell? Because if it's interesting and in good enough condition you could take it to a dealer and see if they'll buy it, of course you won't get as much, but at least no one's gonna fuck you over.
That is the only reason I got infinity warfare, to play MWR and talk shit
Fuck /u/spez.
how many people have signed up?
Dope thanks 
Mario Tennis is my all time favorite competitive game. Never lose or break that game. I cherish my copy.
I don't give a damn to be completely honest, I think everything is fair when we are talking about entertainment. Araragi is a pedophile and a siscon, but who cares, it's just anime. 
Which one is Emm....?
You don't even have a birthday today, how does THAT feel?
I kinda thought that myself. If WWE somehow called it knew this would be the case that's genius. 
Nah, this is still all about us.
Do we know how long the cached copy can remain on a device (asduming a valid subscription, etc)?
Yeah this year has been incredible for solving huge mysteries like this. Plug /r/unresolvedmysteries  
^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^reddit
I'd go flynn over yuri... just saying, desperation flynn might be worth it lol
**cough** might as well reduce fletcher's bomb count to 1 **cough** ^^^/S
Tru but it's so toxic 
They say “imitation is the sincerest form of flattery”.  If that is the case, I am pretty flattered, as when I got home last night, my wife was dressed up like me for Halloween.  She pretty much nailed it, mustache, cap, button down shirt with company logo,  work boots, Credit Union pen in the pocket, except I do not wear a bra...  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/circlejerk) if you have any questions or concerns.*
He's only worked on Indie games right? How much have most of the games he's worked on sold for? I'm willing to wager NONE of them had modern AAA asking prices.
*blep*
I looked at your post history. You're a communist. You support an ideology that has murdered tens of millions. No one gives a shit what you think about race. Or politics. Or anything. You're a parasite. 
Divarealness, True words from one who knows. Thanks. You are right on the money. I have no desire to do anything, don't listen to music much (my usually fave thing), cant read anything of length (don't care), no desire to watch  a movie (makes me want to puke). This is a bitch of an illness and nobody gets it but us. u can PM me also if you want to talk
Well in1948 the Israeli's they had a larger army with better equipment, more guns, the Arab armies were very poorly equipped, not well trained, and disorganized. Yes Israel has always been a regional military superpower. 
I stickied this, because this is war, and we need as big of a signal boost as we can get. Let me know if this isn't necessary.
We don't know, we have nothing about unnamed. But that's a really interesting theory.
The only thing you ever pay for is what you purchase. Some markets you don't even need to log in to see what's on offer
GET THIS MAN A COAT!
Okay. Did you want any specific natures? Have pretty much all but Timid
Am I the only one imagining knife sounds going "shagashagashagashaga" when I see those knives moving?
This list is absolute garbage. Untitled 05 over 02/07/06??? Black Beatles top 10?? ONE DANCE #3 ABOVE ULTRALIGHT BEAM???????
It honestly sounds like hardware. But one software test I can suggest is remove the graphics drivers and reinstall.
The image of the dissasembled camera is a Spotmatic F from 1973. I have the first model Spotmatic from 1964 which I use as my main camera. The source linked stayed that Jonathan has a Pentax K1000, so if that is accurate, then this is not the same camera that Jonathan has, not even in the same family. 
You don't *really* need to make anything fancy, the pressure from the squeegee is enough. For a squeegee I find that a piece of stainless steel of reasonably thickness is the best. Just a little bendy is the golden ticket. Those rubber squeegees suck IMHO for hand use - they're too flexible and they'll "bulge" into the aperture (below the stencil surface) and either push more paste through or scoop some out. Hope that made sense...  Honestly though, for a single TSSOP package I think soldering it by hand is **way** less trouble unless you're doing the stencil printing for practice/learning. Once you get a little practice you can solder that thing by hand in less than a minute.  EDIT: One other thing - the beauty of reflow soldering is that you can get away with quite a lot of misalignment. Unless you're doing super fine-pitch stuff - particularly packages with the leads underneath the package (DFN/QFN/BGA) you can put a reasonably messy print in the oven and have it come out perfect. Even on fine pitch packages if I have to rework something or don't have a stencil, I'll just put down a single thin sausage of paste across all of the pads with a syringe and reflow it. Usually reflows just fine. Surface tension is a wonderful thing - IF you're using *good* solder paste (Kester, Chip-Quik). Even if it's messy you can reflow it and clean up any shorts in a few seconds with flux/iron. 
Thanks!
Now I'm too scared
if we get there
Yeah thanks but I'm not gonna click every 2 seconds like a spastic.
In that case there are millions of people out there, all hosts who never age, don't have to breathe and who run on some sort of electrical power source that would eventually need to be recharged and who somehow don't know they are hosts (medicine having, I don't know, vanished overnight -along with a number of other concepts like death, reproduction etc.) *but* who know that there are such things as hosts in Westworld. How do they no know what they are? Wouldn't they be unwilling to treat their fellow hosts as meaningless toys if the only excuse for doing so was that they aren't really people?  I mean, they could spin it that way if they wanted to.  I just wouldn't be able to suspend disbelief any longer.
* here's mine: *  2/3 cup oat flour *  1 scoop protein powder *  1 chobani greek yogurt *  2 cups whole milk *  1 tbs olive oil * couple scoops of peanut butter (I dont use a specific measurement for this, just throw some in there) * your choice of fruit for added flavor (I prefer strawberrys, or even better a banana which has about 100cals) * Lastly I put a "super greens" blend in. This will do nothing for your weight gain. But, having a shake is a good time to supplement and powdered greens are great. Noticeable change in my digestion/energy.  So here's the deal. This shake is large, it will fill up a large cup. It IS thick and will leave quite the mustache ;) Sometimes, I'll take 15-20 minutes drinking it. Just put on an episode of your fav show and pound it. I think it tastes great, but you may need to alter some things in order to get the flavor you want.  The protein powder and greens are optional. Although, if you're working out your should be taking protein supplements. If you aren't working out you need to be careful as just adding this to your normal daily eating will cause you to put on some lbs and you don't just wanna be "skinny fat" haha.  So a little about the shake itself. The main source of calories come from the oat flour and whole milk. The olive oil (weird, I know..) also has a huge amount of good calories in it, but the main purpose is for the consistency of the shake. It makes it easier to drink and you cant taste it or anything. There's not much to say about the greek yogurt. Shit tastes great and has 120 cals per unit. Peanut butter for more cals and good fats and a good source of protein. Get smooth peanut butter.   Buy oat FLOUR not steelcut oats or any bullshit like that or you will have to preblend the oats so your shake isn't lumpy.  Lastly... Don't drink this in the morning as you will get sleepy. You're putting essentially a huge meal worth of calories in your gut. Don't drink this until after dinner. It will make you full and if you do it before you won't eat your normal meals.  Don't drink a ton with your dinner. You'll end up looking forward to the shake after your meal, atleast I do.  Hope this helps man. Always looking out for the skinny guy tired of being called "chicken legs" or some shit by friends/family. If this write up interests you and you think  you'll try it out hit me back and I'll provide some brand names to buy. Its not expensive at all, hell of alot cheaper than buying meals to match what you're getting from the shake.   Edit to add: To help conceptualize the shake a little bit. Like I said, it's about 1.2k calories. That's like finishing your normal dinner and then throwing a drive thru hamburger, large fry, and a coke on top of it. Without having to eat all that nasty shit. Shakes are the way to go for people trying to gain.
I see. What about individual PVP? 
Mate you are so fucking dense. I didn't invent the word tracking, if it matches the action you are doing then yes by all means.   &gt;if tracking is "petty" blame google and the idiot who leaves his information public under the same name and intentionally attempts to get a rise out of people  Google didn't make you do shit. The "idiot" didn't make you do shit. The public information didn't make you do shit. Guess what that leaves us with? You. You did that shit. &gt;Something your fatass probably never ran in grade school KEK couldn't resist  I'm guessing you are saying that I can't track something because I was fat in grade school (idk your sentences don't make a lot of sense) . Tracking someone through the computer doesn't require a lot of physical activity but I could see how someone as dumb as you would confuse those things. But anyway good one KEK :).   &gt;The flair was achieved my thanks for entertaining me and supporting the cause  Congrats man now I don't need to deal with dumbos like you :).  &gt;You're clearly the bigot of the two of us.   Yup I was the one who "tracked"(kek) someone down because they had a differing opinion.   &gt; I'm simply mocking someone, and if anyone is full of hate it's the two mentioned streamers and their community's look at the way they react when they're criticized or when someone has a difference in opinion.  It's not very nice to mock someone. Unlike you who reacts like a normally adjusted adult by "tracking" someones social media right? That's why people like Destiny allow for people to come on to his stream and voice their opinions because their bigots :).   &gt;you tried to start the conversation calling me a pussy and ended it with asking me to explain your ignorance and manipulation of the English language. The brain is a powerful tool it's a shame you pseudo-intellectuals waste yours.  Called you a pussy cuz u a big fat pussy lip. Manipulation by using the english language correctly might I add. Also my ignorance for using the language provided to us the right way, how silly of me. I agree the brain is a powerful tool maybe if you had used it we could have saved this whole conversation. :)   **edit** - You seemed to have deleted your account. Why was that? I thought you were just getting started on reddit. You big ol' pussy lip man the fuck up.
&gt;a good defense is only for the wealthy.   Truth!
I mean I paid $40 when it released, but honestly I would have paid $60. It's easily worth $7
Make Polyjuice Potion with Hermione's hair, then take all the pics/videos I'd ever need for future "use." And maybe see if Luna wanted to hook up, before it wore off. 
I know I was just joking. Instinct actually runs a ton of area near me. 
Would have been fun to watch the blitz, but felt more fair finishing with the rapid, especially since it was quite one sided.
I remembered it because it wasn't that long ago. Are we supposed to let OP go with a repost?
The fuck? how'd you know i dropped out? As far as i know i've never mentioned that on reddit.
I personally think you'd be better off saving up a bit and getting a mount that's a bit heavier duty. I'm not sure what your location is but try keeping an eye out for a beefier tripod/mount used on the classifieds. A quick google search says that the max recommended weight of the Skyview Pro is 20lbs, and I think it will struggle under the weight of an 8" newt, even without auto guiding accessories. Consider getting an Orion Atlas or equivalent or at least something like the Orion Sirius.  It's not that your mount isn't capable of doing the job, it's just it's not capable of doing it well. Astrophotography can be frustrating enough as is even with the right equipment when you're starting out; I think that that mount will only compound your issues.   Don't just take my word as the gospel though, talk to some of the others here and see what they think. I just know that it's generally recommended that you have a mount that is advertised to handle 2x the weight of your equipment for astrophotography.  Another advantage of a heavier mount is that it won't limit you quite as much in the future when you make upgrades. For example I've got a skywatcher EQ6 pro (same mount as Orion atlas) which is rated for about 40 pounds. I forget how much exactly but I think my 8inch Newtonian weighs about 15 pounds, maybe closer to 20. I'm currently in the process of buying a 80mm apo triplet (~6lbs) which will inevitably spend some time piggybacking on the Newtonian as a guide scope. With my mount I shouldn't have too much an issue taking on the extra weight as long as I'm well balanced. If I had opted for a mount that only advertised a 30lb payload I doubt I would be able to do this, at least not easily.   So definitely keep in mind what your future plans are for the hobby. You might be able to do what you want with your mount if you put a tracking motor on it, but it all depends on what kind of results you're content with and how much fighting with the equipment you're willing to do. Ask around and do lots of reading and research before you commit your hard-earned cash to a piece of equipment!  Best of luck, and I'm looking forward to seeing you post deep sky images!
You just blew my mind.
Did she get the ely tho
The fact that it's got double the sales of AssClass is what really shocks me
Crabbe's contract is cheaper than something Noel is going to get. We had interest in him in the offseason so you figure we were probably going to pay him the amount he got in Portland
Drool worthy 😍
Shouldn't say this, even if you say no spoilers, it puts an idea and obviously confirms some people's assumptions or predictions about what will happen. It's honestly still a spoiler when you say it like that.
I'm not super familiar with the area, but your description sounds like my memory of some of the properties around Galson, Arcadia, Middle Dural... which would all be pretty close to the reception at Dural.  Maybe go for a drive around that area if you have time to scout? Perhaps St Benedict's Monastery in Arcadia would suit? or just someone's property (with permission and perhaps a small fee of course)
OTK ANGRY CHICKEN 
LPT: The fjrst time you fjnd a fjord, don't frolljc in the fjeld with a fjddle.
I got a nice Adidas pullover from /u/Burt__Macklin__FBI. Thank you.
Some tanks have too much carry potential atm.  Roadhog can pick off and one shot squishes while having high sustainability. DVA can move in for quick finishing kills while also absorbing every projectile and knocking with her mech. Zarya at full charge can melt targets down as well as using a minor AoE.  You'd think that characters like roadhog and dva would have lower mobility or lower reload times (roadhog) to make them more of a tank and less of a big character storming around the map.
The elven gods are *functionally* gods...but not gods in a religious sense. Which is what Solas means, because he'll also chide the Inquisitor for claiming to be more than what he is. [If you embrace the idea of being a chosen of Andraste.]   Solas never denies the evanuris were extremely powerful. What he pushes back against is that they decided to create a religion centered around themselves for no reason other than they wanted something more to obtain after they'd conquered everything.   The elven gods are gods among men, but they have no abilities that a religious god would have. They presumably can't see into the future, they can't judge, they don't know anything more about the afterlife than we do. Worshipping them does nothing, except fluff their ego.   The elven gods still have rules and limitations. A god in the sense that they presented themselves to be, wouldn't. 
Isn't upkeep the same as sharpening?
Is calling names on the internet your big macho man tough act?
I don't think a Pennsylvania did it. It could cover a lot of space during the investigation but other than that I doubt a Pennsylvania did it. 
And then the Founding Fathers clapped.
so far got a light miho would like a dark miho and extra vics to finish a evo 3 nike
THAT'S IT, FIDEL IS THE NEW APPOINTED VP
He did some in his last few streams, yes. It's not like the guy is going to play PoE past a certain point with how his build was shaped.
No Country for Old Men.  It was so incredibly boring that by the end of it I was sitting there zoned out with drool hanging off my lip and finally came to once that ridiculous ending monologue ended.  I looked at my friend and said, "What in the fuck was that?".  He had no idea either.
Ok just told me lol
Kinda curious how anyone could even find this sub without looking for it lol
I bounced AB for Keenan and 2 firsts   Id think AJG for Keenan and a first.  Keenan side has waaay more risk associated with it...but I love me some Keenan.
I agree with /u/Cyssane
Muh muffin! Did I switch off the stove...
Glad I kept my GOLDEN Angry Chicken, he's ready to dominate if needed
WOW, I turned back real quick LMAO.
Yes out of luck.
Enb (epicnamebro) has a really good walkthrough and he explains a lot of the lore along the way
I hate the bruins simply because of 2011. From when the Vancouver - Boston match up was announced, I (as a canucks fan) assumed this would be another slick example of how a skilled team whoops up on a physical team everytime. Fast-forward to after Game 7 Gritting my teeth watching the results, solidified my pure inner hatred of those big dirty fucks. Oh and Brad Marchand's stupid fucking nose pisses me off
The grind for that badge will be fun. Saving it for last.. 
Grant Gustin? 
Same here.
Who the fuck cares.
No wonder you guys are getting special treatment.  You can't even figure out the definition of what is against Reddit's rules LMAO
WE are the party of the working class and WE need to donate money and/or massive effort to make it stick.
Dude, they don't
yea this made me excited. Either Griffith is getting a big smack in his ego getting downgraded or Guts is gonna get more upgrades.  Or it might just be a big simplification. But Im still excited.
If you didn't do this in school you're a dirty liar
Does Rich Swann have the championship? 
"incredible last-minute equalizer" my money is on yes
Can blow your load and get a good night's sleep afterwards sounds pretty rewarding.
I'm currently a student in Dr. Ward's 416 section. His section requires you to learn the material outside of class (online videos and practice problems with solutions) and you complete the homework in class in groups of four to be submitted by the end of class for a grade. His midterms are very fair. I highly recommend him.  His website for this semester can be found [here](http://llc.stat.purdue.edu/2016/41600/index.html), it'll give you an idea of what to expect.
This kills the honey.
Why are you going with Haswell instead of Skylake?  This build is a mess...
形だけの大卒に意味なんてない  全大学に卒業試験を設けろ
[Link To Original Submission](http://reddit.com/5ft6dl)  ______ ^^^I ^^^Am ^^^A ^^^Bot. ^^^Please ^^^Message ^^^/u/cc-d ^^^if ^^^you ^^^have ^^^any ^^^feedback ^^^or ^^^suggestions.
I think I prefer my steak and eggs with a side of greens in butter as a diabetes treatment. 
Try the Cascadia Creamery stuff they've got. Small organic producer from Washington State. Also the La Chaumine from Goldin Artisan in Molalla, OR. It's a goats milk cheese done in taleggio molds. The milk right now is super, SUPER fatty so it's a bulgy, unctuous, delicious masterpiece!
Screw Oona
Just got mine yesterday! Actually a pretty hefty sample, I'm looking forward to testing it on some shoes that I don't care too much about.
Tried Callin the Wells Fargo Center for the inside scoop lol
I knew I recognized this model, nice job claiming someone else's work is yours.  Honestly deserve to be banned from here, your first post and first impressions have shown me thus far that you're not trustworthy.
From my experience for sneakers, chuck taylors are the best deal. White or black, low or high is all you. I used to wear all vans but the converse hold together much better in my experience. Just take a magic eraser to the midsole and good as new. Stan smiths are nice, but you'll be just another sheep hopping on the stan smith trend at this point. There's some white Kent Wang sneakers that get a lot of praise if you can land a pair, I have [these](http://shop.nordstrom.com/s/cole-haan-trafton-cap-toe-sneaker-men/4322875?cm_mmc=google-_-productads-_-Men%3AShoes%3ASneaker-_-5145840&amp;rkg_id=h-f2bfb7f59c6c6fc4584589e6b6ac93d1_t-1480550174&amp;adpos=1o1&amp;creative=39386437793&amp;device=c&amp;network=g&amp;gclid=CNuH8JnX0dACFQmVfgodWxoKJA) which is prob my most worn shoe rn cause its so simple. The best imo are sl-01's and common projects but $$$.   If you prefer running shoes, Ultra boosts (esp white), nmd's, tubulars, flyknits, ect. Its really up to you just try to keep it simple and black or white cause they go with anything.
Your post (probably) hasn't broken any rules, but we see these kinds of things a lot. Look at our [most overdone items here](https://www.reddit.com/r/mildlyinteresting/search?q=flair%3A%28overdone%29&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/mildlyinteresting) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Whoever finished higher in Supporter Shield standings hosts. Toronto finished fifth, Seattle seventh and Montreal eleventh. 
Ones that give good head and ones that dont
Cold weather = buying outerwear. Crazy concept.
It's an institutional issue, guidance counselors where I grew up never brought up the trades. My family is in plumbing so I at least knew that if college didn't work out I could still have a well paying and satisfying job in the trades, but many weren't informed as such.  College worked out and I love the job I have, but there's a beauty and satisfaction making something gives that isn't valued my our financial-education complex.
It's all organic, fam.
Desireball: AoE Charm Person, Expireball: cloud kill.
Its half life is milliseconds so probably considering chemistry happens on the order of attoseconds
I would thank you, but that's desktop only 😕
[3x3 Trios] (http://i.imgur.com/kgQpmJW.jpg) **Spoilers** for FMA:B
Well put. It's disappointing to see the company not flourish while knowing they started off so strong.
At least you have to post on t_d to get banned, Just subscribing to certain subs gets you auto banned from shit like me_irl (and a large number of other left leaning subs) so who's the real fair one here?
[**Trios 3x3 Part 1**](http://imgur.com/WvH4ogi) [**Part 2**](http://i.imgur.com/TkMlBOd.jpg)  [**Mystery Theme #1**](http://i.imgur.com/KpTtnN5.jpg) [Mystery #1](/s "Characters in their 20's")  [**Mystery Theme #2**](http://i.imgur.com/VRruHoh.jpg) [Mystery #2](/s "K Names")   [**Other Anime Favorites**](http://imgur.com/a/4zAcM)   Top | OP | of 2016 ---------|----------|---------- [1 Gintama Spoilers](https://track3.mixtape.moe/iroahj.webm) | [2](https://my.mixtape.moe/duejvp.webm) | [3](https://my.mixtape.moe/yxzvso.webm) [4](https://track3.mixtape.moe/ingrnl.webm) | [5](https://my.mixtape.moe/qzefpc.webm) | [6](https://track3.mixtape.moe/rchocd.webm) [7](https://my.mixtape.moe/rzncis.webm) | [8](https://my.mixtape.moe/iianfk.webm) | [9](https://my.mixtape.moe/agzpai.webm) [10](https://my.mixtape.moe/psgojb.webm) | [11](https://my.mixtape.moe/qzmshr.webm) | [12](https://my.mixtape.moe/lwpmvu.webm) [13](https://my.mixtape.moe/rogaao.webm) | [14](https://my.mixtape.moe/unlbzh.webm) | [15](https://my.mixtape.moe/ngbgkx.webm)  Top | 15 | ED of 2016 ---------|----------|---------- [1](https://my.mixtape.moe/nnruof.webm) | [2](https://my.mixtape.moe/jklkrw.webm) | [3](https://my.mixtape.moe/oolwmh.webm) [4](https://track3.mixtape.moe/qiuzzk.webm) | [5](https://track3.mixtape.moe/sdkvyb.webm) | [6](https://my.mixtape.moe/gbsdjs.webm) [7](https://track3.mixtape.moe/hgfpsr.webm) | [8](https://my.mixtape.moe/vytftd.webm) | [9](https://track3.mixtape.moe/fstmuy.webm) [10](https://my.mixtape.moe/rcifnh.webm) | [11](https://track3.mixtape.moe/bouluw.webm) | [12](https://my.mixtape.moe/ulnoar.webm) [13](https://my.mixtape.moe/odzbki.webm) | [14](https://track3.mixtape.moe/qqvcwh.webm) | [15](https://my.mixtape.moe/saxdzh.webm)
Basically just use two of the same drives, it stripes the data across both drives, so you end up with 1 drive combined. Hypothetically this can up to double the read/write speed and you can use all the storage of both drives as one.   The biggest downside is that if one drive fails, all your data is gone. 
I played Empire Earth 2 a shitton when I was a kid but never fell into AoE. TBH I prefer Empire Earth a lot more for some reason :/
If you have done the attunement(That you need to do to enter) it shows you exactly where the entrance is
I'm about to post mine as well :D
My LG G2 did that
Does Atlas have any objective advantage in finding syndicate medallions?
The sad part is that our economy is doing *so good* these past few months, thanks to Obama.
Product List:  Primer: Benefit Cosmetics the POREfessional No foundation  Concealer and also concealed some redness in bits: NYX HD Photo Concealer Wand in fair Undereye Concealer: Benefit Cosmetics Boi-ing full converage concealer in light shade Brows: NYX Tinted Brow Mascara in Espresso Highlight and under brow: Milk Makeup Holographic Stick Contour: NYX Highlight &amp; Contour Palette in Sculpt shade  Eyes: NYX Roll on Shimmer in pink, lined/in the corners with Aura eyeshadow from Lime Crimes Venus Palette.  Maybelline Mascara Volum Express The Falsies in black  Lips: NYX Soft Matte Lip Cream in Copenhagen 
"I've had a lot of success meeting folks through DPP, but never have I posted myself. It seems, more often than not those looking for a good time can't really carry a strong conversation or are silo'd into a particular theme or time of availability."  I have a trouble finding people that will recap just anything from our play. If an interruption comes, Fire, flood, Earthquake, it is just so hard to pickup the threads. Do none realize there is a real life too?
Thank you for straightening that out for me. I saw that but don't always english good.
I went over there and checked it out, did not see any intelligent discussions just a lot of whining.
Good catch.
I just love OHM.  Their heroin album. Their reaction to commercial success album.  Their weirdo, dark, Hollywood gutter album.  I don't think they were falling apart as a band but they sure were broken as people.  And the Chili Peppers have never been about a consistent guitarist. OHM has some of their most classic songs- My Friends, Aeroplane, Warped, Transcending, Tearjerker, Walkabout.  "My tendency for dependency is upending me..." Give it another shot man! 
If Osiris came out today people would blow their load screaming OP yet nobody plays him and reddit apparently thought he sucked lol. But he got a slight buff so now everyone's gonna play him thinking they'll stomp but end up feeding.
All dudes so you'll need a ditto, but nature options are Bashful, Impish, Modest, Rash, and Careful.  I know you said it didn't matter but when you have choices might as well pick lol
You could try transforming the data before looking for outliers. The log transformation sometimes makes right-skewed distributions approximately normal.
11-14-16 attack on basically a maxed defensive TH9. There is a major difference from the previously discussed 2 Golem, 3 Hound GoLaLoon (with max Hound in CC). The difference is that you almost **MUST take out 3 ADs, Queen, CC** and keep your own Queen alive with Bowler GoLaLoon (compared to 3 Hound GoLaLoon when only 2 ADs are needed to be taken out)  Composition is changed to: 2 Golems, 2 Hounds, 4 Wallbreakers (always carry minimum required for wall + 1; so if skull walls then 3 WBS so you can send 1 WB to test for bombs), 1 Baby Dragon, 5-6 Wizards, 12 Balloons, CC max Bowlers, 2 rage, 1 heal, 1 jump, 1 haste, 1 poison.  When selecting a base, choose a base where the queen is accessible with 3 ADs (they should be reasonably close together and not in more than 1 compartment apart). This strategy can work on compact bases and spreadout bases.  - Funnel: The **Funnel is EVERYTHING**. If Bowlers or Queen loop, the attack is OVER. Start by setting up on side with your Baby Dragon. Then drop 2 Golem to cover one side(preferably not at the same wall tile to avoid splash damage). Drop a wizard on the opposite side of the Baby Dragon create a funnel. **Leave an ANCHOR building** in between the Golems (i.e.: do NOT do a line of wizards). Drop 1 Wallbreaker to test for any bomb in between the Golem then drop remaining WBS. Hopefully the anchor building (in this case, the elixir collector) is still alive and you can drop your Bowlers followed by Heroes and every Wizard but 1. Watch 0:15 to 0:35 for exact details.  - When CC is triggered, drop poison where they will end up. Drop a heal when main killsquad engages CC and queen. Drop a jump when killsquad reaches last layer of defenses before the second wall ring (don't delay your jump or else killsquad will spread out). The jump should allow you to reach a compartment to reach all 3 ADs.  - Drop a rage dead in the core as soon as your Bowlers jump into core. This allows maximal DPS to kill ADs. Ideally, do not drop rage outside of base or before heal.  - Hound/ Loon timing is tricky. It should not be dropped when your Killsquad is completely dead. It should be dropped when 2 ADs are down and the 3rd one is being targeted by Queen or Bowlers. Drop Loons surgically (2 on each defense) with both Hounds deployed on remaining AD. Drop a haste to quicken Loons towards AD and drop a rage over remaining defenses.  - Hopefully your queen is alive for cleanup. You should also have held 1 Wizard for cleanup. Drop them far away from your Loons and allow them to work clockwise or counterclockwise  To summarize: Bowler GoLaLoon is about **picking the right base with 3 ADs, Queen being killed by killsquad**, **perfect funnel**, **proper spell usage** and **surgical Balloon deployment at the right time**.
Explicame
(They did)  You are witnessing our High-Energy first hand
I've been actively looking for a reddit alternative due to the_donald, so thank you for this. I mean, still kind of looking to be honest but I doubt I'll find one. I also love reddit. It's been part of my life for almost ten years and I really don't want to leave it.
I'm going to disagree with you to an extent about the differing opinions thing. Differing opinions do exist around here, but only one really "wins" the post, so to speak. By that I mean this place is a huge fucking echo chamber and anyone with a differing opinion from that of the winning opinion gets down voted to the depths of hell regardless of how factually correct their statement.   For example, I've never once heard a good thing about the Caesers Palace track though it does get brought up every so often. And at the end of the day, it doesn't matter if it's boring. It's just a bunch of overtaking opportunities which, according to the winning opinion on this post, is the only thing that matters.  Now that's a bit weird because it's awful contradictory. There's this wonderful track that offers many many overtaking opportunities which it sounds like is the only factor that matters but then the track gets shit on as boring or bad? I'm just confused at this point. What do you actually want?
Same here, same expirence, same conclusion!
Pools for Vegas will be announced probably the week before or during that week same as always and brackets probably tomorrow. 
No, he's rewarding everyone who donated or supported him with positions in his close circle, regardless of how unqualified they may (and usually are) for that position
Yes, that's what it was for me: granulation tissue! I guess there was a gap when I went for my 6 week appointment. He had to put in another stitch. He's been saying it needed to be taken care of now because it would cause problems later. And he did mention that the dryness was probably contributing to my issues.  That sounds rough! Glad you're feeling closer to normal than not. I'm hoping for better results at the next appointment.
When in reality it's all the sites run by the left engaging in censorship, reddit, twitter, facebook, etc.
I've been levelling legion as prot pally and holy sweet jesus, it is a brute. pretty near impossible to be killed by mobs. the one area where you kill murlocs and gargamesh(sp) is..I was pulling around 30 murlocs at once and just demolishing them...ending the fight with 90% hp and a mountain of corpses. Granted, I was using all tools available....but still, I was solo'ing lvl 110 elites  sea grogs...or w/e they are called...while I was 105. It's almost absurd. I can't really comment on warr as I haven't played it. but pally is definetly fun and takes a beating while laughing it off.....plus..dat shield tho
Aha! Didn't know that, thanks!
Did they check the pitch measurements already?
But there's other boats Germany had beyond hydrofoils (that sub boat isn't really a hydrofoil, seeing the dry dock picture).  The E-boats for Germany and their variants, for example.
He's... not even president yet...
Cause you should need to actually put effort in to claim the supply drop. This prevents people from dropping from WT5 to WT1 to claim a drop just because they can't find the guts to take on GS appropriate enemies. If you are playing in the correct world tier then the GS of the supply drop is matched appropriately to you and shouldn't be an issue. 
Darth Vader driving a Ford pickup truck, please. 
&gt; it seems like he was very highly respected in  &gt;the 80s and early 90s as a perfect example of success.  Oh my no. The man has always been a crass self-aggrandizing vulgarian, and the people who actually pay attention to these things have always known that.  Most of his image is carefully-crafted bullshit, and he profits off the fact that a certain percentage of people buy into it, so all these things like "Trump steaks," "Trump water," etc weren't actually *made* by him, he just licensed his name, just like Krusty the Clown in The Simpsons.  In reality, he is a mediocre-at-best businessman, and not terribly-well respected in the business community. He's been involved in over 4000 lawsuits and numerous bankruptcies. Some business analysts don't even think he's actually a billionaire, some think he may not be worth much more than $200 million, which would be a significant figure, because that's how much he inherited from Daddy. If he hasn't seriously increased that amount, inflation means he's LOST serious amounts of money.  He is, in short, a reality TV star. It's all scripted.
The process of evolution for me to arrive at the point where I am now has taken over two years, and I did not arrive at my conclusions lightly or for some misplaced sense of martyrdom. I will respectfully disagree with you about outgrowing my current conclusions. It is possible I could change my mind, because there is never a 0% or 100% probability of anything in this Universe, but I can emphatically declare it is highly unlikely I will change my mind.  When I look around at people who are my parents' age, I see (unfortunately) very little happiness. I see a lot of regret, and a lot of couples who do not love each other and are together just because it has been that way for so long. I dissatisfaction with life and the system in general. And if there is any way out, I want in, and so, I am where I am now. While this is not all directly related to consumerism, it certainly goes hand in hand with it.  And thank you, by the way, for the well wishes.
If you're willing to funnel money illegally to whatever candidate's name is written on the card slipped to you under the table during your interview, you might just get that job.
&gt; he's obviously remembered for *it* which he wouldn't be otherwise  He wouldn't be remembered for the scorpion save if he never made it. He would be remembered for other things.
Sure.  You can look them up on reddit or you can click the little reddit icon on the page where you retrieve their information.  
Bebe himself is our MVP according to that stat. Apparently he is better than Lowry, DD, JV and everybody else.
If it's going to be netting $2000 in a month, why sell it for $300?
Danny Devito
I want more Ultra Rare Addons that allow to kill survivors without Mori, but at great cost. Like Trapper gets to kill Survivor who gets trapped, but he has only 3(maybe even 1) traps. Wraith can Kill an Injured survivor with his surprise attack, but his decloack time is tremendously increased or something, or/and he becomes more visible. Hillbilly is able to kill chainsawed person, but his charge time tremendously increased and turn speed decreased. Or something like that.
Retroactive punishment would be best here.   I don't think it is clear in real time what the exact contact is, and the ref may have just thought Adrian was trying to reach the ball by sticking his foot out if the ref did see contact.   From the opposite angle or with any slowing down, it seems like Adrian really does watch the ball go past him, look at ibra, and then lift his studs up. 
I disagree entirely on Ayala and Moreci.
I was thinking about Leeroy as a counter to that new 5-5 warlock minion that damages itself for 5 every time they summon a minion.
My mom won't let me take him :( I'll have to just forever live at home
I'm sick of stationary fucks having an advantage against me stim wallrunning like fucking roadrunner.. how?!?!
I saw someone compare markelle fultz to dwayne wade. Seems like guys are always hyped as the next superstar and it seems to rarely happen (of course)
Ahhh pretty similar start to me then! I need to try McCabe as TT too as i acquired the wild ones (spent waaaaay too much time putting off assembly) but he seems cool. Been testing with the jorogomo recently, before azami comes but i'm not sure how i feel yet. Ahhh not too far from me, i'm a Henchman for Stronghold games in Hull we should try to get a game in some time :D
If the vieux carre worked, you could try a brandy or rye sazarac. The brandy one with absinthe is a big hit amongst my friends.   BRANDY SAZARAC  * 2oz Paul Masson Brandy  * .5oz Simple (1:1)  * 4 dashes peychauds bitters   * Lemon Twist  Coat inside of glass with Absente Absinthe. Very thin, but coated. Chill that glass. Mix ingredients with ice in tin, to very cold. Grab chilled glass, and put a whiskey wedge or ice ball in. Strain drink into glass, and prepare/Twist the lemon Twist into drink. Run the oily side of the lemon Twist around rim of glass, throw lemon Twist into drink and serve.   
I know a dyslexic person and he can't read video game text well at all.
I just saved in front of berries trees and soft reseted for iron fist
That flag burning man last night was pathetic!
Can anyone recommend this over the  cm14.1 nighties?
Oh god that would end In horror.
Could be completey wrong but I think they are 4 tones apart.
He won the popular vote more states though
Be scared
thanks dad love ya
So today I got a chest for my first and second run of the day. Both from the Barret herself. Not bad rolls either.  http://imgur.com/a/KJUJr
ayyy yo
Didn't want to talk people with a lower K/D down, you are close to be even and later positive, that's realistic and something you can easily reach. But I see no point how 0.2 is possible, that's freaking 1 kill on every 5 deaths..
http://imgur.com/p710VbG
Yep, they buffed Juno's Light Barrier and Ensa's damage modifier for inflicted enemies, something like that. 
Sadly it's the only fix i've found that works 100% of the time. It's not ideal but it's saved me a lot of wait time. 
TBH, it's just as hard to understand there lyrics in death metal as it is desiigner.
Why would the b1g champ jump washington?  Both would add a top 10 win, Washington is currently ranked higher and has 1 less loss.
the original thread was, if memory serves, an AMA about a guy who claimed to have sexual relations with his mom; the story that he gave for how it started was that he broke both of his arms and his mom offered to help him jack it while his arms were healing to help with his mood, and it just kept going for a bit after that.
I just finally picked it up an hour ago, Traded Splash Multi Taker, Brown Becky and SS Ambrose Sig.
Do you know how Festival Plaza works? Basically:  * Find someone who offers Treasure Hunt\*\* * Buy it * Immediately after you have gotten it, run and claim the daily award from it * You will get Prize No. 2, a Bottle Cap.
This is the first minor sign that we might just see Trump win reelection because nothing will change in 4 years. Its a little worrying.
Exact same thing happened to Tech in 2013. 3 to start (+BM), 1 at the end
Up up down down left right left right A B Select Start
I think CS 422 (Networks) should be on the list too.
That could be true. Supposedly 200 games are Greenlit every 2 weeks so there's the potential for 5,200 games per year just on the Greenlight side of things.
After travelling to get this earlier, I arrived to find the laptop only had 128Gb SSD. Fantastic, not as described in advert and way too small for my needs. Travelled 76 miles in total, in the fog, AND got a puncture on the motorway on the way up to his house.  I think the gods were trying to tell me not to buy this, and they were right!
You're probably right
falk said he hasnt announced hes leaving yet even though there was a huge rumor he was. He probably leaves, Max goes north but if he doesnt who knows
Yeah you're right actually.  I think initially I thought "nice guy" because he was doing this whole act of "Omg no, I'm not one of those gross jerks who only want to talk to single girls to hook up.  You're so awesome, I just want to be in your great company!"  
Me too thanks.
Somer-assault weapon! 
Many liberals will type that shit over the next 4 years.  The best 4 years.  edit:  8 years
It's still a cheap shot, but that doesn't mean it's illegal.
that's disgusting.
My flair is ready
She may not be fancy, but FO3's Ol' Painless got me through a lot of shit back in the day.
How far from Florida are you?  Overnight shipping is ridiculous and I'm willing to be with the dry ice and all of the restrictions it will cost a crazy amount of money.
I have some to those and do like the writing. It was a nice surprise.
The only time I ever try this is when I have a rifle that isn't a one hit kill. And then I hit the guy and they don't die.
Oh don't go and die or Jill will have 0 votes next go around
What a hecking long pupper
Yeah.  The presence of mind to still be aware of the ball, when he was obviously 100% in tunnel-visioned revenge mode, is actually quite impressive.
 Like this story and want to be notified when a story is posted?  Reply with: Subscribe: /M59Gar  Already tired of the author?  Reply with: Unsubscribe: /M59Gar _____ Don't want to admit your like or dislike to the community? [click here](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=HFYsubs&amp;subject=subscribe&amp;message=subscribe%20/u/M59Gar) and send the same message. _____ If I'm broke Contact user 'TheDarkLordSano' via PM or IRC [I have a wiki page](https://www.reddit.com/r/HFY/wiki/tools/hfysubs)
Where did you order it from? I'd love to get my daughter this for Christmas as long as it isn't too much money. 
Pepe has taken on a new form. 
[4 hour old xkcd reference and nobody linked it yet?  Weird.](https://xkcd.com/1053/)
Dude you sound like you have a great school.   Update the website.   Do a few demos.   Do a Christmas and a new year's offer.   Maybe offer a weekly fitness class.   Good luck with it.   Competing and advertising your victories would be good too.
No kidding. At least it's only while the stream hits the water. If it was time in the washroom you might die.
ITT: People defending "gg ez" and fondly reminiscing of times they were asshats.
I think OP was more concerned about the guests getting pregnant of contracting STDs...
I'd have to do the math.  I was talking about release 6\* Garland.
"Millions of victims will suffer" - holocaust-esque vocabulary describing untold horrors. Conjuring images of famine, pestilance, war, torture, rape and murder...  But you're actually referring to a breach of privacy. Is that right?
I'd make it a life time of petty revenge. Little things such as knocking over their trash cans or banging their wives.
By these measures, Bills are better than the Cowboys! Hello, this is legit!
We are so small and insignificant. Life is meaningless. Drifting through nothingness on a speck.   Love space. 
Sick buzz lightyear rep, gl with selling!
Jag älskar du 
​**Whiskey Network Review #278 | /r/Scotch Review #112- Glenfiddich 18yr, 86pf | 43.0% ABV**  Thanks to /u/Tormore21 for this sample.  **Color:**  Gold  **Nose:** Sweet pears apples caramel toffee light and crisp. A bit richer than the 15 with more caramel and toffee.  **Taste:**  Sweet and rich. No heat. Toffee, caramel apple, mild pear and apricot jam. Faint thin vanilla and a good deal of a nice toffee note. It's all still light though, and the mouthfeel isn't too impressive but on the whole it's light, floral, sweet and approachable.  **Finish:**   Medium, thin, no heat. Apples ,pears little syrupy sweetness with a hint of caramel. Despite being higher in proof than the 15yr, the finish is significantly better and much more complex. Also less rough.  **Overall:**  Good but light, thin and floral. Expensive and not as complex as one would expect for the age although it definitely pales the 15yr. Sweet fruity apple pie but not as much depth as I'd like for something on the top shelf. It is definitely improved over the 15 and I'm going to give it props for that. I'm scoring this a Rank 6. NOTE: For those that like to get uppity and may notice the words "price", "top shelf" and "expensive" in this review and therefore feel their beginning to bunch, fear not. This review does not take price into account. It is merely something I enjoy commenting on while focusing on the holistic profile of the dram.  *TWAT REPELLENT*: For those that *may* notice the words "price", "$" and "expensive" *may* appear in my reviews and therefore feel their panties beginning to bunch, fear not. This review does not take price into account.  Thanks for reading!  Rating: 6 -----  Decoded:  **1** | **Disgusting** | So bad I poured it out.  **2** | **Poor** | I wouldn't consume by choice.  **3** | **Bad** | Multiple flaws.  **4** | **Sub-par** | Not bad, but many things I'd rather have.  **5** | **Good** | This is a good, solid daily.  **6** | **Very Good** | A cut above.  **7** | **Great** | Well above average  **8** | **Excellent** | Really quite exceptional.  **9** | **Incredible** | An all time favorite  **10** | **Insurpassable** | No better exists  ----  ​
I agree it's a weak skepticism.  I'll just be a bit disappointed if it turns out to be William and he doesn't personally open one up onscreen.
I've had a charge for over a year. It's cool to track your sleep. But I mainly got it because I can read texts from it. Saves a lot of time at work. I didn't want a fancy smart watch or anything. I picked it up on eBay really cheap because the HR monitor didn't work. Win win for me. 
&gt; He lost the popular vote  100 % irrelevant. Campaign tacticians only care about winning more than 269 electoral votes. If the rules were different beforehand, both Clinton and Trump would completely change the way they campaign
It's exactly what I wanted. Thank you. 
I'm a forward player and can't defend to save my fucking life. I always do this, but for me its like, "you aren't good, I just suck."
You don't need to run if t on a DC, any PC with RSAT will work.
Defensive catcher metrics are changing/incomplete, though. Fangraphs doesn't include the pitch framing that got worked into DRS last year, by that stat Yadi was +2 last year.
250k km já são alguns. Óbvio que são. Mas por vezes depende mais como são feitos, do que propriamente o valor.   Prefiro um carro de 250 mil que os tem porque faz estrada aberta todos os dias e anda mais de 50 km diários, do que um motor com 150 mil feitos em Lisboa e anda 20 min por dia. 
People get this point clearly. Stop making it assuming they're unaware. I see it everywhere. The problem is Michigan is missing an obvious opportunity to right a wrong by paying for flints water infrastructure needs by charging companies more for the water they're profiting from
You're efficient.
What's wrong with you, there ain't enough damn cheese!
This guy gets it.
Most films are shooting Alexa and it's only really a 3.4k camera. 
Also there are these called "stop signs". I've seen entire groups of bicycles run the same sign
Just drop them into the background, not contributing to the story in any way, and have them pop back in when they come back. Ignore the character when they are gone, and bring them back in without any explanation.
Being forced to die in a war you don't support is not even remotely a privilege
It's just buying beer as a teenager you fucking nerd
just a drink?
Very nice ass...nice pussy too
Hope he gets away with it.
The most stubborn person I ever met said that I'm the most stubborn person she had ever met. I'm winning.
Don't get me wrong - love it in mayhem - but the stability is just so bad.  Give it some love Bungie!!!!
3 for both
She says she likes it when mush passes through her, and says she enjoys peeing in the ocean, so I think we can fairly safely say she goes *somewhere* (sometimes like a feesh).
I got it once and didn't notice anything so I don't know.
How does Cactaur spawn work? Is it like some of the mobs (the dog things and the scorpion things) where walking around will attract them to you (I tried running around in circles and these 2 particular mobs kept spawning and jumping me) or is it one of those things where it's either spawned during the day or it isn't. If it's not there, then you need to progress the day and check a spawn spot kinda thing?
I love how everyone is just ok with this 
No Artour stream with EG boys this time FeelsBadMan
Best of luck to whomever applies. I almost applied but realised i like to give my opinion on many points and i dont believe it would be ethical to debate my opinion with people if i was coming from a position of power. To whomever becomes the mod please continue to allow people to express their opinion whatever it may be. Canada is a country that should continuebto be open to all viewpoints.
So babyface Rock and CM Punk weren't cocky,  got it...  
Well, if you want to go that way. Humans are social creatures. So, acting according to your nature, you could try to socialize and find people that offer that instance. They'll most likely agree because it doesn't cost them anything. Can probably just use the LFG, too.  After all, we're playing an MMO.
With the Reserves you have to keep everything upright. ADLS was always the big one. Medical stuff next. Then Family Care if your a single parent.
It's not great but it makes me laugh; there's also a tag about how Jesus could never get into any clubs in Galilee because he's always rolling with 12 dudes and no women.
Alright just to add to the fun : I created a 30GB virtual drive inside my SD card... and deleting from the virtual drive is instantaneous -_-
I hope the test doesn't backfire, admins might consider this a form of "brigading" (it's not)
**Title:** [[REDDIT] /u/SmRo0/ https://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198304294826](/r/GoTradeAppeals/comments/5ft70k/reddit_usmro0/)     **Username:** /u/SmRo0   **Original Post:**     First Appeal - https://www.reddit.com/r/GoTradeAppeals/comments/5740w5/reddit_usmro0/  Second Appeal -  https://www.reddit.com/r/GoTradeAppeals/comments/5cnayf/reddit_usmro0/  --- Hello I was told i could appeal at the start of december for my third appeal  I wrote all i can think to say in my second appeal   After almost 2 months i hope to comeback to the subreddit  Once again i am sorry for what i have done.     ---   What is the account you used to attempt to get around your ban?  - https://www.reddit.com/user/Spenser911/   - http://steamcommunity.com/id/69DicksForHarambe69  - I have not used this reddit account in over a month and i dont plan to use it in the future   ---    Ban message  https://www.reddit.com/message/messages/6mre6c   https://www.reddit.com/user/SmRo0 https://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198304294826               *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GoTradeAppeals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
To be fair, we can just leave youtube out at this point - it's just vloggers bitching about youtube and kids making minecraft videos.
And hell, even questions that focus on shapes, puzzles, and patterns could end up being culturally biased. The words and objects you're most familiar with depend a lot on your environment and upbringing. The way you associate things can depend on your environment and upbringing.  Side note, I'd be interested to see someone write a culturally biased test in favor of disadvantaged groups. Not as overtly biased as the Chitling test, more subtle.
Standard  Can you rank these players...  Flex: Crowder, Watkins, Dixon, Lewis  TE: Fiedorowitz, Henry, Green, Bennett
If he doesn't deliver, we will create our own truth.
How i'd imagine kidney stones would feel
**PLEASE READ THIS MESSAGE IN ITS ENTIRETY BEFORE TAKING ACTION.**  Your post has been removed as it violated [Rule 2](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_2-). Please check that your post doesn't contain the following issues:  * **Your post can't be specific to your situation or involve a story. Please make sure to depersonalize your question and remove any unnecessary context before posting it again.**  Please note - once posted, the titles cannot be edited. If your title breaks the rules, please feel free to [make a new post](/r/askreddit/submit?selftext=true) that fits within the rules.  [**When you've removed the answer or unnecessary context from the textbox, message the mods for review and reapproval**](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit&amp;subject=Post+Review+Request&amp;message=My+post+was+removed+under+rule+1,+please+review%3a%0d%0a%0d%0ahttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/5ft70o/how_can_i_legally_or_illegally_make_20000_in_3/) and ask the moderators to re-approve it.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
ikr  and its a red mortar, which means it has like 15 studs of splash damage
And? I don't think we've lost game where juo has had under 50 yards this year. Look at the box scores of our games there are regularly 8 or 9 guys with receptions every game. Ryan has been incredible at finding the open man and picking teams apart. 
Got my first pair of CDBs in the mail today http://imgur.com/a/NiDuT  Are these scratches and discolorations normal? I've heard these boots like to get beat up, and might even look better that way, but I figured I'd ask here first.  There are some small marks all over, but this one on the left I was most concerned about http://i.imgur.com/BYpwSrl.jpg  I got the shoes for $90 and they have free returns. Should I try sending them back and asking for a different pair, or should I roll with these?
You can actually find their requirements online, and while it is a bit over my head, I've heard others describe it as pretty fair. I could see problems with whitelisting a server by DNS with no ability to determine what portion of the traffic was streaming, and see how someone could take advantage of that.  That said, if you're a startup using some kind of technology that isn't compatible, you could be out of luck. I haven't seen such a case myself (besides Plex which has its own nuances), but I don't like the idea of that.  To counter my own logic: No matter how nice my neighbor is, I wouldn't like him to have an armed nuclear bomb in his basement. So "nothing bad has happened yet" isn't entirely rational when you're talking about a tool ripe for abuse.  I'm not trying to defend T-Mobile so much as paint shades of grey. I'm far more concerned with ATT/Verizon, that's all.
Someone on here once described this as the "Ballast Point Starter Kit".  Always stuck with me...
**PLEASE READ THIS MESSAGE IN ITS ENTIRETY BEFORE TAKING ACTION.**  Your post has been removed as it violated [Rule 1](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_1-).   You must post a clear and direct question, **and only the question**, in your title.   Please note - once posted, the titles cannot be edited. If your title breaks the rules, please feel free to make a new post that fits within the rules.  If you feel this was removed in error, please [contact the mods](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit&amp;subject=Rule+1+Post+Review+Request&amp;message=My+post+was+removed+Rule+1,+please+review%3a%0d%0a%0d%0ahttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/5ft70p/serious_professional_singers_of_reddit_re_voice/).   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Absolutly not 
I personally have not heard him speak English, but all I was saying is that there could be other reasons that TSM did not take him on (if they did turn him down) besides simply they didnt offer enough money or that they found a superstar that they think is better than him is all. 
brace yourselves
&gt;microagression  &gt;blackface  These two things are not at all related, if something is a "microagression" (not actually a real thing), there's no fucking way that it's on the same level as blackface. Besides the math not adding up, just... no.
Ahahaha gotcha. You'll get it next time I'm sure :)
What's to stop someone from creating a bunch of fake accounts, going to /r/announcements or any other popular subreddit and posting a ton of hate speech? Would that get that subreddit banned? The beauty of reddit is that there's no identifying information to any user if they so choose that they don't want to provide it, but the other edge of that (along with sites like 4chan) is that anyone can pretend to be anyone. Want to go to /r/The_Donald and pretend to be racist to prove that that they're racist? Easy. You could do the same thing with any subreddit.  You have one of two options here basically. You can either a) enforce each account to have identifying information so that we can punish those individuals partaking in hatespeech etc by banning them from reddit and preventing them from just creating a new account either temporarily or permanently, fully knowing that this removes one of the greatest strengths of reddit. Or b) you can accept that complete anonymity inevitably leads to great examples of the fact that *sometimes, shitty people are just shitty*. **They** should be held accountable. Subreddits that encourage this behavior should be as well (and frankly, you should have to show us hard proof of this before any action is taken against any subreddit). Individual users should not be able to trigger discipline for the subreddit as a whole when that subreddit otherwise puts solid effort into following reddit's rules, removing toxic users and posts, etc.
Fuck, this is good. 
i just hate how long the hairs are.. and straight... and thin... It's awful.
It's there but it doesn't do anything. The Robin also won't hand a call off from LTE to HSPA+ without dropping it.
Lot of Fumari from trifecta. But loving the flavor choices that I can see.
Is there a database anywhere of physical homebrew releases?
I would never do it but I'm impressed with their combo of free time and need to be a jerkoff to others. 
Phila: 2017 1st round unprotected portland, 2018 trade swap with portland, 2019 first round unprotected portland, 2020 swap rights with Portland, 2021 1st round unprotected Portland... Etc   Portland: Noel   Do they offer anything that we'd want besides CJ or Lillard? Which Noel alone won't get us... Seems like this is a BS rumor or a potential blockbuster deal (doubtful).  
I'm on the same boat... I really want those DLC. Hopefully later today or early tomorrow they'll send us codes.
mmmmmm
Oh my god. You just gave me this idea of a site wide "shadow banning", where only users of The_Donald could see posts from other users of The_Donald. How long do you think it would take them to realize? How long before they just start trolling each other?
Thanks for the tip
Goddamn I love wife porn
i got an extra bww code  ill pm you 
Cant feraligator learn dragon tail and can't snivy learn twister?
I was a bit lazy this week, but luckily I made a [Trios 3x3](http://i.imgur.com/iFM5Cx6.jpg) several months ago.  Inspired by /u/RainbowsLocks and /u/collapsedblock6, I also made things for my Pokemon teams lately. I couldn't remember back to the old days, but I do have the ones for the games I played when I got back into Pokemon earlier this year. [Y](http://i.imgur.com/tqqf2KT.jpg), [Sun](http://i.imgur.com/abdFzGz.jpg), and [Moon](http://i.imgur.com/suDDPD8.jpg).
 Well, it sounds like you've got the same kind of stock thingy Cuda has, so keep us informed as to what those low down connivers are up to, please :) Level 12 should let you see what people are going to do, before they even know themselves, lol. 
Yeah,  there was a lot of fatlogic towards the end with genetics and "eat healthy and accept the weigh the kid is"  stuff,, but unlike FAs of today,  there appears to be far more accountability and a greater focus on just getting to that goal weight and then focusing on acceptance,  rather than our modern attitude of having acceptance and then self loving our way thin.   I also noticed that when the child obesity expert was talking about the statistics of getting obesity under control,  he seemed to state those numbers as if that was an unchanging fact,  and that's something we still see today.   People say "95% of diets fail" as though this is somehow relevant to them.  These are social outcomes,  they are not set in stone the same way other diseases statistics are,  when the doctor tells me "40% of CEDS with gastric dysmotiliy in their 20s have a feeding tube in their 30s" that's a possibility no matter the precautions I take,  he's telling me my odds so I can plan to prepare.   But obesity is different, “95% of diets fail" just means that the effort you put in directly impacts which of those two groups you end up in,  do you want to be in the 5%? You can if you choose to!  And if more people choose to,  5% will grow to 100% and we will have cured obesity.   The mortality of obesity is caused by non compliance and late intervention. Your behaviour has a direct result on your prognosis when your disease is obesity,  don't want to be compliant? Don't be cured.   Other diseases only have a tangential relationship between behaviour and disease processes, you can slow the process but not stop it. Don't want to be compliant? Well your quality of life is going to suck and maybe be shorter but you'll die the same way as others with your illness. 
Pay off debt/adoption
You're the worst!
&gt; E.S. Posthumus  Wow, sounds cool, thanks, gonna listen to it.
Loved Percy. Reminded me of Eddie Murphy in Bowfinger. Can't wait to see him again!
This is the first time I have seen it. Really disappointing
There isn't solid proof but that's a pretty common theory. That they're were 3 more with them and they were erased from existence
You would be surprised at how often that has worked for me in tournament. I mean it's a terrible strategy but it's also a hilarious mix-up especially when they decide to constantly run in without properly tomahawking or anything.
Akainu is very powerful, the new zoro is good but isn't busted like Akainu is.  it's up to you. just don't get disappointed when you can't get Akainu again haha. gl! 
thanks, that was my concern...so glad to have the confirmation.  Looking at my game now, I can't tell where the code is, so it must be some sort of consumable item that just shows up in my inventory (?).  I'm excited though. Going to start the install as soon as I get home 
because his post is being fucking condescending?  saying how basically older gamers find it 'meh' because younger people don't know any better?  which is a total crock of shit?  and he's basically defending TB being a negative miserable bastard just because he's older ?  so basically, with age, you can be a condescending prick, anyone that thinks a new game MUST BE a younger generation, and a heavily negative reviewer with no enthusiasm is just because he's older?  we're not fanboys, this was a discussion over TB's review which was frankly shit.   he complained about progression, I'm sorry that's literially not even a fucking complaint, I mean do people complainin you don't 'level up' in halo? literially he is the only person to moan about that. hosts 1 hour long 'review' was an hour of him bitching about 2 things because he hadn't even played the game much.
[Porque no los dos?](http://i.imgur.com/c7NJRa2.gifv)
Und was ist, wenn der Bewerber nur dominanter Top ist?
&gt; At the same time I do still think that Sean Murray and Hello Games should take some responsibility for lying to everyone. That's the biggest thing for me, is how they acted after the game came out and people started calling them out on their lies.   Except when seeing how unprofressional and immature *gamers* have been, I don't think their response here was at all out-of-line.  No amount of "professionalism" will stop a rabid mob mentality as we've seen with NMS.  And the lack of the community trying to quell its own to bring some sort of... well, professionalism... outside of the "lying" that's taken so badly out of context is part of that reality.  We have to be real honest about the responses here.  Take a step back and look at some of these responses.  They're fucking terrible!  We as a community aren't *entitled* to professionalism, which is why AAA companies treat gamers with such little respect and continue to do so.  Seeing the responses at large and how much this had blown up, it's even more clear now than ever.  That sort of culture is borne out of the community, otherwise it will always be some form of "herding cats" or frank manipulations without a real need to talk to the general public (see: Bethesda).
Thanks for the suggestion! I'll scoop it up next time I'm at a book store.
Face is shopped for sure. So that makes it harder. :/
I can hardly draw a stick figure
Why is this in the Atlanta sub?
You and I are talking about two different things. I am not making legal arguments about believing victims. I am talking about *personal* perspective, not legal. As in, I personally can believe a victim and also think that the facts are muddled or that the perpetrator was under the mistaken impression that their actions were acceptable. That is not a logically inconsistent perspective.  But just as a point of clarification, testimony *is* considered evidence under the Federal Rules of Evidence. It's not necessarily scientific in the way that a rape kit would be (though it can be, expert witnesses give scientific information regularly), but it is evidence. In the Catholic Church example I gave, the crimes occurred decades before they were prosecuted, and no physical evidence was available by then. Further, molestation does not necessarily leave physical evidence to be discovered. So the court relied on the testimony provided by the victims and the co-conspirators to get convictions.
From a guy that worked in a sex club, I can tell you that around 50% of women born after 1990 have pierced nipples and few enjoy plugs. That's just anecdotal, of course YMMV
https://youtu.be/OFQQALduhzA
Nah, I've tried turning off everything touch related on Windows; there's no way around their garbage.  I'll give the mac a try this weekend, remind me if I don't get back to you!
Redditor for two years - nice.
All ill people? Just people I think are ill? 
I agree it's primarily for "selfish" reasons- however I would say the whole context of "better our abusive/manipulative TFW employers, than their even worse abusive/manipulative local employers" is a terrible excuse. We shouldn't want that in our country, and if we actually wanted to help people abroad it would be actually accomplished by simply doing so, whether through aid or putting pressure on them to improve.
Do I get to film myself fucking the Rockets for extortion purposes?
I have a wife and toddler at home, my wife has a better policy and my kid is covered under it. My dad had his first heart attack at 35, he was obese. I got a little beer gut but overall I put effort and thought into making healthy life choices and should not have to pay this "poor health tax" until I need it. 
Looking for these in US11! please pm me if you have them
Interesting. Do you have a link to the wikileak? I just hate to think this is how the power majority thinks.  And who is Seema Verma's husband?
Yeah it doesn't make any sense. It can't be countered at any time. Old card wordings can be weird.
and the list in the wiki. https://events.ccc.de/congress/2016/wiki/Congress_Everywhere
Ive had girls crying to try and manipulate me and I reacted the same way. Damn look at us psychos. 
Boston: you name it, we get it.
The only people who say things like this are people who think that they went to a diverse school because an Asian kid sat at their lunch table
So the solution to people being run over by bad drivers is to scare people away from safer modes of transport and put more people in cars, thus adding more bad drivers.  Fantastic plan.  I don't even know why I'm responding to such an obvious troll any way...
Ehh, we agree that it's minor in the large scale, but I wouldn't go as far as to say "who gives a shit". It's undeniably a bad thing, it's just a symptom of other worse things that need to get tackled first.
This happened to me, WTF....
What you have to understand is that he isn't really the CEO. His wife's bull makes most of the decisions and /u/spez just carries them out for him whilst handing over his entire salary. This is of course because /u/spez is a cuck. 
The fact that we don't teach k-12 kids about loans and credit as a requirement for graduation is why 18 year olds view credit cards and school loans as free money.  Millennialism has nothing to do with the problem.  There are plenty of community college dropouts with debts hanging over their heads.
Just the aging plastic interior of this 31 year old car would make me say no.
Thats a pretty psu
/r/the_donald users get really offended whenever they are treated like how they treat people with different opinions in their own subreddit. This is too funny
It worked on some for me, but not the brush kits, because they were already marked down (online).
+/u/User_Simulator /u/dogerwaul
#YOU CAN'T STOP THE WINNONG OR THE SHITPOST!!!
Wow! I'm a Hello Kitty fan. The leather HK you posted earlier must have cost a fortune. 
True, true. Got a point there.
I drink to forget.
It also means that they fucked up their Trainer Time idea and gave the possibility for ties/horrendously long games in the first place.
I like to keep a clean house, but that doesn't mean I don't have trashcans.   Anyway, that's probably a crummy analogy, but without a clear place to express those negative opinions where are people supposed to put their trash?  Is it really fair to /r/pokemongo to try and make them take care of the trash? Long story short is it may be counter to the positive / constructive theme of the sub, but I feel like there needs to be an outlet for Silph Road users to voice complaints or simply rant.
That looks extremely painful
There is actually quite a lot of clans named 'harambe', or something similar (like my clan). If the name 'harambe' gives you a 2 day ban since the name is offensive... does it mean that every one of us in my clan gets a ban? WUT?
yeah lemme call rodger goodell real quick
Supports fall off the hardest because once everyone gets cauterize two, you are essentially evolving into a moral support. Front lines at least have a high health pool; Once cauterize goes out, there is nothing you can do- unless you just instalock Pip because Pip is exempt from this rule.
Sweeet!
I was pretty stoked for planet side 40k. I just cannot enjoy eternal crusade. 
They all do things by the book with no room for imagination or creativity.
Your Scalabrine story reminds of a story I read 15-20 years ago about the guys on John Wooden's last NCAA title team in 1975.  A sort of "where are they now" piece.  Pete Trgovich told about how he'd occasionally show up at the local gym - as a non-descript, middle aged, bald guy - and get into a game with the local hot shots in their late teens and twenties.  They'd all be laughing at the "old man" - and then he'd hit a jumper.  And another.  And another.  And another.  And another...  "Who's got next?"
I'll +1 this.  The Hercules can deliver as big a rip as you desire. That being said, I prefer small sips myself.  I don't know about the Nibbler XL being portable really.  I'll admit I've never had the balls to do it and I know you and Sam and others rock it out all the time.  It's just a pretty large 130$ piece of glass hah.  The only good thing about that Dhgate glass is at least you don't cry so hard when it breaks.  I will call out that both the Nibbler XL and Nibbler AC v2 are solid glass pieces.  The glass is thick and can take some hits.
Hi, John!  A few quick questions for a pair of fans in SC c:  1. What is your favorite episode of It's Aways Sunny in Philadelphia?  If it is The Nightman Cometh, what is your second favorite episode?  2. What is your favorite kind of ice cream?  Of pizza?  3. Are you familiar with the term Alaskan Pipeline?  4. Our housewarming house show is on December 17th.  What time should we put your set down for?  Thanks for all the great work!!  We &lt;3 you. -M&amp;E
I read the title too quickly and thought "What's the big deal about a girl squatting 135lbs for 8 reps?" 
If they aren't saying it to your face, I can guarantee they're saying it behind your back.
[Nightmare Mode](https://i.ytimg.com/vi/pZ1RpEVfvgM/hqdefault.jpg)
Yep, all of which is relevant to the case. I'm really struggling to understand the outrage here. He's gathered the relevant information. Surely it's then the job of the prosecution to present the whys.
how about 3.5 months later... football is dumb.
When [this](http://archive.is/ZmULb) is true, it's very troubling.  These immature kids in the chat are the ones trying to decide what everyone who comes here sees.  I've been here over double the length of these twats; I know what freedom of speech looks like, and I know what censorship and propaganda looks like.  Guess which one /r/politics is?
Oh great thanks
Research mainly two types. The Choo Choo mechanism (slow, hard to build, but very accurate), the single fly wheel (easy to build yet innacurate), and double fly wheel (we are using this. So-so consistency, fairly simple.) 
damn gg
I received Black Flag with my gpu a few years back but I haven't played it yet, now I have this free as well so maybe its time I completed the series. (Only finished 1)
I held out some insane hope that we would see him decriminalize the drug and issue massive pardons for offenders jailed for Marijuana. I'm still holding out hope that this will be his last policy initiative, but I sadly don't see him taking on the task.
That would only be a movie interpretation because I'm not sure if the books (which are canon not the movies) have any indication of that. But it is an interesting theory. I think there could be a difference between Snape wanting to kill Dumbledore (because he knew of the consequences if he did not) versus Snape wanting Dumbledore dead. I don't think Snape wanted him dead but believed his killing of Dumbledore would be the only way to save Draco and fully gain Voldemort's trust.  Same thing when Harry performed the Cruciatus. He tried on Bellatrix and Snape but both were unsuccessful, and in those moments, you can bet he wanted to hurt them. However, it was not true to his character and may have conflicted with his ability to perform the spell. The one time he was successful was in protecting McGonagall. I would argue his desire for harm this time was less emotional than his other attempts, but since this time was true to his character, it was successful. So I could argue that had Snape wanted to kill Dumbledore because he was angry with him, it would not have been powerful enough to murder him. But since his purpose was to kill to protect and ultimately, set the pieces in play to destroy Voldemort, the spell was strong enough to kill Dumbledore. 
Polak plays the right side very well. Don't watch him tonight cause he's definitely sick and always plays way better I swear. 
OH, I GOTCHU. THAT SUCKS. =/  ..... I KNOW THIS ISN'T WHAT YOU WANT TO HEAR, BUT THEY'RE REALLY COOL. I HOPE YOUR WAIT IS SHORT. 
I think the difference is that children do/say silly things and learn from them, eventually developing into adults (who behave in a socially agreeable way). The people who are the topic of this thread never seem to make that developmental leap and rather concoct vast paranoid conspiracies or complicated theories to explain their friction in society. 
Well first off it doesn't take a dark and convoluted mind to reach nihilism, it just takes a rational and intellectually honest one, unfortunately nihilism has a plethora of stigma attached to it because it goes against the simple minded blind optimism of contemporary society and has been warped by popular media. Also nihilism affects people differently, there is no set path you take after this disillusionment. Surprisingly nihilism, and philosophical pessimism, have become quite popular in media over the last few decades so it is very likely you have already encountered the foundational ideas or at least some of the questions posed to reach that conclusion. It is difficult to gain a proper understanding because there are a lot of other ideas you have to understand and it is a long daisy chain of logic to get to that point. If you want a much more pessimistic view, which judging by his choice of words seems likely, then enjoy exploring my post history. I am a cold hearted logical person that can be quite abrasive and condescending.   On to personal issues, first off start by understanding it is often difficult for someone to talk about these ideas as they are rejected by most as we have very powerful defense mechanisms in our ego to protect ourselves from realizing our own lack of significance. Another issue is that since he is going out of his way to discuss the idea with you, it is likely he wants to use it as a rationalization for action. I am almost an anti emotional person in a lot of things and despise personal opinions that have no anchor or foundation to verifiable data, so trying to argue against me by using subjective value or personal feelings will result in an immediate dismissal of continued effort. Keep in mind that nihilism does not mean suicide is logical and more than living is logical, we just are and there is no point to any of this (see anthropic principle.) Since you care about his well being then it would be wise of you to encourage him to explore existentialism/absurdism. While Camus is often referred to as the teenager's existentialist, I would still highly recommend his work as it beautiful written and easy to digest. If you want to have a practice conversation with me so you can try to grasp an abstract of the foundation of nihilism then I have no issues doing so, just shoot me a pm and ask away. I will mainly be trying to help you reframe your questions to a logical sense instead of an emotional one.
The ODG R7 is as small as I would expect for ML if they are really trying to do focus planes and give a solid MR experience.   It has taken a long time for microdisplays to get to 1080p and Thomas Furness has a good point that the pixel size is pretty well played out at about 4 microns for the SLM technologies (LCOS and DLP, not as sure about Micro-OLED although they are behind).   A big issue I have with them using a 1080p LCOS is how they can do "focus planes." The sequential frame rate of LCOS is typically 120Hz (120Hzx3 for RGB) or maybe 180Hz at the outsides (the Liquid Crystal switching speed is a limiting factor). This would give say 2-3 temporal focus planes at 60Hz or 4-6 at 30Hz but the various focus planes would break up in both focus depth and color; I would think it would be a visual mess if you turned your head.  DLP is better in this regards and they could play more with color depth versus focus planes. I heard from a few source that their early prototypes used DLP with variable focus.  DLP has already been used to change the spatical resolution about 10 years ago with "wobulation" https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wobulation . If not for the Business Insider report, my pick would have been DLP for doing temporal focus planes.   You have to understand that there is a tremendous amount of FoMO and wanting to not miss out on the next big thing going on.  The big companies can justify based on the cell phone and tablet market size and hoping this is the replacement.  I suggest you look at all the Artificial Intelligence work including the Intel iAPX432 https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Intel_iAPX_432 that almost bankrupted Intel (they were saved by the IBM PC) and LISP computers https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lisp_machine.  For a non-computer analogy look back to the Supersonic Transports (SST) of the 1960's. There are lots of times when everyone goes chasing each other's shadow.  Everyone but Apple is pretty desperate as Apple is making most of the profits while companies like Samsung are shipping at lot low margin profit and Microsoft and Intel are relegated to a stagnant PC market (my advice to Microsoft would be to make their operating system bulletproof so people would be willing to trust having a phone that worked like their computer rather than adding bells and whistles that make it less reliable). Apple is likely doing a rear guard internal action just in case something develops. I think they may be a big bemused look at Hololens and wondering how people wearing that are a threat to the iPhone.  
Yeah he lost but he was still very happy, either rich or just doesn't care a lot about money.
There were Bant Eldrazi lists in Team Unified that ran 4x Birds of Paradise because teammates were using Hierarchs to be fair
I wonder if they can legally do this since this is within the Great Lakes watershed.  If this was coming from one of the Lakes directly they would need approval from all 8 states and 2 provinces to remove water from the region.
Just started on ps4 too. QuesoTheKid
I doubt it. The die hard skepticism on this sub leads me to believe nothing less then video of the capture would be enough proof.
If not, there is a a whole channel we could study in our free time :)
Have you guys ever watched Jake and Amir? Your duo seems so similar I can't help but draw parallels and would like to know if you ever used their material as inspiration for your content's direction. 
I was looking forward to that myself.
The way I put it is, they made SC more of a game than a sim. I never felt like I was building a city in SC, just playing a game that wasn't even that challenging. It is a shame though because SC had a lot of great ideas in it. 
That's why they grabbed Green Arrow and the others...so much leather...kinky minded aliens.
That is a solved problem. We already have a global system for distributing private keys.
I mean maybe you can justify Bourque as a hard working veteran or something but how can you possibly call up Henley over Greer or Grimaldi? 
"Where is the line" is absolutely the question of this show, and frankly I have no answer.  I think it has something to do with determination, and the ability to make choices in whichever way the person wants (not determimable).  I dont know tho.
That card is adorable! I literally fainted when I saw the pic for it. It is honestly just like Yukata. KLab's best work.
Go fuck yourself x3
Yes.
That's got to be the hardest hit I've seen against a moving target that wasn't head on.
Somebody please tell me this whole episode is either a joke or a nightmare. Anything but reality.
Just from all that I've read online it's the ultimate, "Your milage may vary" situation, at least in the US. There are people that say they had to take a neuropsychological exam, show school records, get teachers/parents interviewed, etc. And this process took months to a year plus and cost thousands of dollars.   Other psychiatrists do some personal interviews with you, rule out other mental health causes, and give you take a survey. In my situation, I chalked up most symptoms to some internal hidden anxiety despite feeling no stress or negative moods. I also had a decade of three different anti-anxiety and anti-depressents meds that didn't help me with my focusing issue.  I was diagnosed while on BlueCross BlueShield without a neuropsychological exam. The DSM V actually says: "“Individuals with ADHD may exhibit cognitive problems on tests of attention, executive function, or memory, although these tests are not sufficiently sensitive or specific to serve as diagnostic indices.”  So they're not totally required for a diagnosis. But, as someone that is moving and must switch doctors, I am considering getting one done anyway despite the fact that my insurance won't cover it. I actually feel kind of guilty because I had a relatively easy time getting a diagnosis (less than 2 months), even though I know I've had every ADHD symptom since childhood.
Yeah my previous manager made me buy mine by my first paycheck, but when I came back he just let me use my plain red cotton polo until I switched to logistics. Then he gave me 2 t-shirts he had laying around. Now my new manager thinks she can demand I buy an OD polo and her only excuse as why mine isn't enough is the material is different. Pretty annoying considering it sounds like it isn't even company policy and is in fact illegal.
I mean, it would be cool if you had actual proof of this stuff.
I went to Taco Bell and my order came out to $12.17 (I don't remember the actual total it's just an example). I gave the girl workin the drive thru $20.17 expecting 8 bucks back. She gives me the change as if I gave her just a 20 then caught an attitude when I looked at her like she was stupid. 
I call my mum "mumsy", due to watching a lot of Crystal Maze growing up
&gt; the Republican party just happens to be the one that's not actively hostile to Christianity  They aren't?  They aren't involved in criminalizing poverty, breaking up families, and actively cheerleading for wars?  They aren't totally behind putting transient profits over the environmental wellbeing of generations to come? You don't have a party in this country that *isn't* actively hostile to Christianity. 
That's just you respawning at a checkpoint.
Hated it at first, now it's probably one of my favorites. As soon as I listen to it, it makes me sad. Idk why, but it does, in a good way. I feel understood somehow.  I used to think it said "and let go" when Chris says "a light on". I didn't get the first part either, but it felt good. Like first stating what makes you feel bad, but eventually accepting that you have to move on.   I know that's probably not the point!... But that's how it makes me feel (:
You should try nihilism out. You get comfort for the same reasons. Except you're not bogged down by morality as well- which is itself ultimately like some sort of divine command. Not much different than God if you ask me.
Because we were complaining that the fight choreography, storyline, and writing was just shit. They're complaining that Olicity isn't together. Huge fucking difference. Like come on, it's not *that* hard to see the difference. 
Hitler: I received plenty of support from believers of Judaism. 
maybe those 17 year olds should keep it in their pants?
I'm not sure about sniper rifle. It might just be me, but I never found it that enjoyable. With a build, maybe. But my advice is go to L's shop and put as many augment slots on your armor as possible and fill them with Max TP and HP Up XX augments. You will not die with overdrive and high max health. Photon saber is also pretty fun, that was the second class line I mastered. A raygun build can also be devastating when paired with a high DPS melee weapon like longsword or photon saber.
Because ya gotta love those fossil fuels, man. No inferior methods!
This is a great image. I went out and bought a bunch of Kong tennis balls for her.
Welp they are jokers that get off on doing weird things to amuse people. I have so many stories about all of the redneck shit that my family pulls. It's  insane. Like the time my Grandpa took the preacher gator hunting and almost killed him or the time that my uncle beat up a bobcat with boat paddle and a bottle of coke. 
You have to keep in mind, though the most populated areas usually go blue, it isn't like it's 100% blue.  I personally would be happy getting rid of the EC, but we would have to make some other charges as well. Maybe compulsory voting and ranked voting versus first past the post? If we keep the EC, we need to add more electors. If we use electors, they should st least represent the same amount of citizens. 
Jidenna - Long Live the Chief
Every rig payload is OP. Thats how it works. The actual counter to it is the HEIGHTENED SENSES perk for the phantom character. It allows you to hear people who have phase shifted. 
Very nice! Would love to get my hands on one of those. Wish they'd make that color again
When you turn it around and [flip the colors you get this!](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/-kPgyJH0h0Pk/TZMyrP-Je4I/AAAAAAAAAnA/623F8-OEPVg/s1600/M%2526Ms.jpg)
this, this is good
I get a condu every 3 labs
I can't even find a complete list of AU shows/movies that are available in general. Netflix doesn't mame it easy to see the full scope of their collection.
Liquid chalk and cleaning up after myself (wiping down everything I touch with chalk) was what the attendant at a gym that doesn't allow chalk told me to do.  It's like they want to avoid a mess and not chalk.
omg! really? 
If Trump ever listened to anybody that is an advisor to him he would never have made it as far as he did.  I am sure his advisors were like "Please stay off of Twitter, you probably shouldn't call your opponent a 'nasty woman' and please stick to the script"  Trump probably said verbatim after some thought and reflection  "You're Fired".
Fibonacci senpai?
-2/3 (REDUCE YOU SATAN WORSHIPER!!!)
&gt;Everyone deserves a living wage.  Why?  People deserve the value of their labor as agreed upon with their employer before they start working. Not a penny more.  You aren't entitled to anything that isn't already yours.
I saw many genuine comments of absolute shock that admins could edit posts. It was generally surprising to me that so many people were either naive or had never, ever been on other message boards.
The Throat Of The World, the Great Caldera at the top of Darshada, the Mother Of All Mountains. Not only is it the highest peak on the planet it is also a sacred mountain to nearly every religion on Tye Shara, which is a bit of a mystery as the mountain was known before any of the other races had crossed the Great Circle Sea to reach the midlands. The Guardians of Tye Shara are based in and around the mountain. They are the only ones who have access to the Caldera.
http://m.imgur.com/gallery/oSiajTF
Keep distracting from the core issue that red states are moocher central. You are probably receiving my taxes, so you are welcome. Have an ounce of gratitude. It will take you far in life. 
I want to go pro RedEye.
He was joking.
What is the strangest thing you both have eaten, that surprised you by actually being good?
That's a good way of doing it. I think friendly fuzzball mode is always good though :)
All 3 of the new maps feel lifeless and empty as fuck.  RIP 1.4.
This is fucked up
#[WEW](https://i.sli.mg/Us6liK.png)  #[SUP?](https://i.sli.mg/whgAek.png)
Using the words conservative, agenda and /r/politics in the same sentence is extremely bizarre.
trash cans with liners. 
guzz lord and buzzwole thanks :)
Well, he vowed to create 25 million so he's already "created" (aka purchased w/ tax write-offs) .004% w/ only 24,999,000 to go! 
Lerngelegenheit: Das GG gilt nur für die Legislative, also die Gesetzesmacher. Es ist nur ein Regelwerk für alle anderen deutschen Gesetze, die gegebenenfalls vom Bundesverfassungsgericht Anhand des GG bewertet werden. Wir Bürger haben aus dem GG keine direkten Rechte oder Pflichten, können uns bei einer Klage nicht direkt darauf berufen.
Lmao,  that's what I thought the gif was gunna be about! 
&gt;Who would you trust to call people into action to fight a war?   Not Donald Trump 
I'd call it a snek 
Stardew Valley
I haven't seen my wife in six months... I try to avoid that freezer...
Currently doing a playthrough of all the games on xbox (played it on pc for the happy ending mod) and I still choke up at the end when Tali says she has a home :'(
I actually have this one on my old phone from like 2 years ago
This content brought to you from "Spain Pool"  &amp;nbsp;  ---  ^(This crosspost was performed automatically as a part of the ImagesOfNetwork.) [^(Learn more about the ImagesOfNetwork, how you can help, and other Frequently Asked Questions)](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_what_is_images_of.3F)^, ^or [^(visit us on Discord!)](https://discordapp.com/invite/0tZsejLgM2vzaExR)  ^([)[^("Remove my post!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_remove_my_post) ^| [^("The bot got this one wrong!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_the_bot_got_this_one_wrong) ^| [^("Stop Crossposting My Stuff!")](https://www.reddit.com/r/imagesofnetwork/wiki/faqandinstructions#wiki_no_really._don.27t_ever_crosspost_me_or_my_subreddit.)  ^(])  [](#off site feed "Spain Pool")
WILL SOMEBODY GIVE THIS GOD DAMN PATRIOT A COAT!!
You don't have to share personalities to be able to have a conversation... 
Because Neith and Bellona need more skins.
Prepare to live in a Mad Max dystopia and get survival skills. Honestly, I've put some thought into this and how climate change will result in survival wars among communities. First Nations are going to be the most successful and influential communities because they still practice living by the land and have passed it along to their children - my husband is one of them. He can build shelter, hunt, weave, render medical attention, and fight. I have a horticulturist for a friend who can garden. My specialty is diplomacy. As long as we can feed, clothe, and shelter ourselves and negotiate/barter with other people we should be able to live a relatively self-sustaining life if things go dystopian.  That's assuming the bees don't go extinct, then none of us will be able to feed ourselves.
#[THIS TRAIN HAS NO BRAKES, AND IT WON'T BE RUNNING OUT OF STEAM ANY TIME SOON! THE TRUMP TRAIN JUST GOT 1 BILLION MPH FASTER!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hgM2xN5TPgw#4801385117000)  #CURRENT SPEED: 4,801,385,117,000 MPH!  At that rate, it would take approximately 349.179 years to travel to the Andromeda Galaxy (2.5 million light-years)! ^^^^A ^^^^bot ^^^^by ^^^^/u/BotsByLiam. ^^^^Please [^^^^use ^^^^this ^^^^form](http://botsbyliam.com) ^^^^or ^^^^visit ^^^^/r/BotsByLiam ^^^^to ^^^^report ^^^^errors ^^^^or ^^^^make ^^^^suggestions!
No idea what this movie is, but I've personally found it better to watch then read after. Less movie disappointment usually. 
**/u/Itsbrianjonesok, Your submission title isn't right for listentothis!** We have to remove it.  Artist Name -- Song Name [genre genre] (year)   For example: Three Trapped Tigers -- Reset [math rock] (2012)   The ' -- ' spaces around the dash and the [brackets around the genres] must be included.  Click on the 'delete' option above to remove this before submitting again.  The submission guidelines are summarized on the submit page for quick reference.  The reasons for these community guidelines are explained in the [subreddit introduction.](/r/listentothis/wiki/reddiquette)  If reddit displays a message telling you to wait a little while before submitting again, moderators are NOT able to assist with this. This is a site-wide feature, and the message will not appear once your account age and total karma exceed required thresholds. [Verifying your email address](http://reddit.com/verify) can help resolve this issue.  [permalink](https://www.reddit.com/r/listentothis/comments/5ft71h/stepdad_my_leather_my_fur_my_nails/)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/listentothis) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Or give him 1m per year bc we can
Dont be a pansy, you can't change the fact that people say gg ez but you can change your reaction to the saying it
Good guy op &lt;3 687 
What's considered a good SAT score? Don't they keep upping the maximum?
Gilmore Girls, although I didn't start it with much purpose either....
Many people on internet typed him that and he fits the description quite well. I could be wrong though.  E: Actually I'm not sure anymore. 16personalities site says they like to avoid conflicts which is totally opposite of Liam's behaviour.  Actually I think he could be ESTP.
cucks.. you fuck with kek at your own risk..
Thank you
Technically when I was an infant I did. 
Well that's enough Reddit for me today
The media...  C'mon man, what is this guy going to write about - the game or this one instance....   The media always fishing for dopey stuff...
Yup. Live in Alberta. There's french on like... cereal boxes? You couldn't get by without learning English here.
well that makes sense.  just strange to do it with just that med.  
I routinely play on The Rebirth. If you want a truly vanilla WoW server, it's what I'd recommend.
Going to be at the game tonight! I'll be in section 223 with my Matthews jersey cheering as loud as humanly possible! Let's go Leafs!!!!!
You're basically saying Nec'Rose, in skilled hands, will be more powerful than Launch Rose. So far you have shown me you think a character that can be exploited by skilled hands is OP. My own opinion of yours. No one seems to or needs to support it. I'm just sick of people like you going at anyone who has an opinion separate from your own.
don't get wits end, it's rarely useful
Cats
How/why does this happen? It's definitely been an issue at some arena before this. Is it weather related or just something to do with the arena?
This link points to an ebook that is no longer free (current price: $8.99), and consequently has been marked as expired.  I am a bot. If I have made a mistake, please message the moderators.
yeah, it is starting to really suck now.
If he/she doesn't have a bag, go for that. A custom disc is also a nice idea.
Poops. Everyone does it.
Heard they don't even open it for visits anymore due to the nimby
Yeah dude we talked about this before i'm still not a fan of it but thx anyway.
Yooka-Laylee is, of the announced indies, the most likely to stay the course and release, for the reasons u/phantomliger said. It sounds as if the Wii U version is being developed internally alongside the PC version, but I will say, to the contrary, that it'll have to be smooth sailings for it or else this version will be in danger too. Breath of the Wild I'd say is in practically no danger at all.  Initially, my only concern was YIIK getting cancelled, but now that they've cancelled an expansion that was already confirmed to be coming to Wii U on a game that was already on Wii U (Referring to Afterbirth+), now my new concern is for the Shovel Knight expansions. Specter Knight is almost definitely safe, but the King Knight campaign? And other modes like battle and gender swap? I'm getting nervous, but if Yacht Club releases them on Wii U still it'll be a great showing of faith for the company (I mean, Shovel Knight itself is already a great showing for them, I'm just saying).
yeah, fits great with a hoodie under. otherwise it looks kinda big but not to the point where you can't wear it alone
because Spurs are shit
If only we could have NFL 2K series of games :(  EA has a "monopoly" on NFL related video games and branding (Madden series). No one's allowed to make NFL games but them and it fucking sucks.
It's a vast right wing conspiracy, my friend!
Yeah, I definetly don't perfectly know the limits of my body yet. I'll be careful. Thanks! 
HAHA so savage 
Olwyn Dr in Tustin. Right off of red hill. They go ballistic there. 
I only see the season 1 pass in the uplay shop
Weed always makes me extremely paranoid for some reason. Like i would smoke a bowl with a couple of friends in college and i would be that one guy curled up in a ball in the corner of the living room shaking kind of paranoid. Everybody else was playing halo 2 and eating pizza rolls while i was terrified out of my mind.  Coke? No problem, i feel like i'm invincible. But after my experiences in collge/high school i fucking stay away from that shit and not only do i get scared, my heart rate slow's down significantly.   
Well, our last rental (Knile Davis) ended up back in KC after like two weeks. Could happen. Of course, we weren't about to play them, either.
I'm not sure any more, but I guess I've had this problem since the Trials of Gnomus update, on PS4. It seems to happen when a lot of action takes place on the screen, although looking at the killfeed in this video it almost appears as if the sound pops up when someone dies.  Another sound problem that hasn't been fixed by the recent update are the cut-off taunt sounds. Since Trails of Gnomus taunt sounds by several players cut off each other and many longer taunts don't play completely any more. 
Are you employed?  How much are you willing to send me per semester?  I'm wanting to get my Masters.
"You see, I've learned something from my time in prison. Friendship is a lot like stabbing; even if you get tired of it, you owe it to yourself to keep going for awhile until everyone's where they need to be." *-from the transcript of the first parole hearing.*
Love this video!!! That dress is so sexy! panties under it?
Thank god
Shut it Morty
i skimmed it, it was one of several articles on the subject and i chose it because it linked back to the original poll.  &gt;a different approach to these numbers would suggest more black voters than Trump supporters disapproved of the Emancipation Proclamation   do you have a point or is this just the "i'm not racist cause i have a black friend" equivalent whataboutism, way to deflect.   &gt;Snopes is shit anyway.  well so are you and your opinions but i don't see what that has to do with the facts being discussed. &gt; There is no politician in their right mind who would openly advocate for segregation or bringing back slavery.  http://www.salon.com/2012/10/12/ten_conservatives_who_have_praised_slavery/
Your presence has been requested at /r/IggyMains
1-800-BUY-PHARMA 
You will be missed. Farewell young one, farewell 
Snatch in Space...
I have a chip.  It has real trouble doing MP3s or OGGs.  It also reboots a few times per use.  I wouldn't recommend it for this.
I think the scaling locks only apply to quitting the queue itself, not quitting a dungeon?  But not sure, I don't really tend to do either.
Part of the show is him watching his own tv show from the past
What are the Adidas 3rd from the left?
9c1's for it all?
I'm a first time watcher and I'm shocked at how... normal(?) it is so far. I've heard a few weird things about this series, so I'm interested in seeing where it goes, and how it gets there.
Are we at the point that pepes are no longer focused on MAGA and important issues?   I guess there's no more important political issues.   R/the_donald is now r/spez-obsessed. 
Sexy as fuck, you've got some skills if you can deepthroat that thing
I really doubt the Patriots are going to sign all of those people
Hi, thanks for the response!   Thank you for describing everything so throughly. I really appreciate hearing it firsthand from someone what has experienced it.   Hope that you're doing well! 
😍
True, but have you considered the weight aspects when dealing with someone 6'6"? As a heavier rider, the PSI required for safe riding on a normal wheel/tube combo is impossible. In fact, at my heaviest, I should have had my tubes pumped to 374 psi.
I live in the same town as him, and work in a cosmetics store. So I have actually seen him a few times as he wears my brand.  Each time, teenage girls freak out and fan-girl over him.
I saw this happen today too. First time I ever saw it. He took out himself and the buddy next to him.
So this was your first post? Make it your last post too, thx ;)
"We believe that this coming change to tyr may give him a larger buff than we intended, this change will not be carried into the live client."
EULAs that mean jack shit in many countries that aren't the USA. EULAs that likely wouldn't hold up in any serious case at all.  And most importantly, the discussion is about using things after the original company is basically defunct, aka the EULA again, means literally nothing because who would pursue it? That legal entity no longer exists...
More like sharecroppers
In accordance with our [Low-effort Guidelines](https://www.reddit.com/r/overwatch/wiki/rules), we currently do not allow the submission of posts with no text description. Please resubmit your post with additional context.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Overwatch) if you have any questions or concerns.*
That'd be a really satisfying thing to see. Might bookmark this game next season to make sure and watch.
Dude just won 400,000 euros...  And lost to the world champion in tiebreakers...  He probably feels fine
Essence --&gt; Absorbs additional vitality  !Translated
[The ball is already past him when he starts to throw up his foot.](https://gfycat.com/BestDefinitiveAmericancrocodile)
What specifically does secret Hitler so differently than resistance/Avalon that makes it more strategic and deep. I always see people hype it up and say it's so strategic and deep but never why. Thanks. 
Haha, not really. I'm allowed to swear at home. I don't do it too much but the internet is just a little different. There's just this mask.
